The goods cost less than 20 euros.
The fee is equivalent to 40% of the value of the goods....
I'm a #PRS_ORG# big customer, so it's not a problem for me.
I only need a number or instructions on what I should include with the package so that it can be tracked by you as a return.
I ordered the #PRS_ORG# a few days ago... for 249€.
Today it costs 179€.
To be honest, I find that very annoying.
Do I need to cancel the order and reorder for the better price or is there another way to get a credit?
I also think it's not fair to expect children to take on a parental role for their younger siblings.
However, I find that it is also good for older siblings to take care of the little ones in moderation.
Look for a moment, help for a moment, bring the bottle, etc.
This is how they learn responsibility, help in the family and are involved.
As long as they can still be children themselves, I don't see a problem.
If your K1 occupies himself for a short time and it's OK for him, that's good.
You are best placed to judge whether this is suitable for your children.
It is not as if he is supposed to wrap K2 and accompany him for hours while he falls asleep.
From a legal point of view, it's probably questionable.
Perhaps this is also the reason for the statement of the psychologist.
Because if something should actually happen like a fire, break-in, earthquake, alien invasion, etc. it would actually be too much responsibility for K1 to take care of K2.
Whether this is a risk you want to take is, of course, up to you ;)
Please help me find the title of a book!
I remember reading a crime/thriller a few years ago and I can still remember almost the whole plot, but I can't remember the title. Maybe someone here knows about it...
The story was about fear and how to deal with it.
Early in the story, a zookeeper commits suicide by covering himself with feed and walking into the enclosure of his big cats.
The case is taken over by a police commissioner who, after a short investigation, becomes aware of his therapist who runs a clinic where he treats patients with anxiety.
The commissioner has a little niece who also has a fear (of fire) and ends up with this therapist.
There are more suicides and there is another protagonist - a photographer who is anonymously commissioned to go to every suicide and document it and post the photos on the internet.
Ultimately, it turns out that this therapist is running an underground therapy group where patients are implanted with a chip that suppresses a fear center in the brain, and the patients ultimately face their fears in the most extreme way possible.
(a woman jumps out of a window, another deliberately drives herself to death)
This is called "the fight" in the book.
In the end, there is a big showdown in the clinic that had to do with a fire.
That is the rough plot, I'm pretty sure that the book was originally written by a French author/writer.
If anyone knows of this action, or can even tell me the title of the book, I would be very happy.
Oh dear, I don't have the password for the Wi-Fi.
I'll have to contact my husband first.
But this can take a while.
What steps do I need to take after that?
Is it also possible to get the price difference refunded?
4-year-old child, splinter under the thumbnail
Kind, four years, has wood splinters all the way under the nail of his thumb (outside).
I tried to pull it out with a pair of tweezers.
Very difficult to pin down.
It didn't work out and it hurt.
Now the child reacts hysterically when we try.
There is no longer any chance.
I'm going to see the doctor tomorrow.
All Bosch power tools, air tools and measuring tools are carefully examined, tested and subject to the stringent controls of Bosch quality assurance.
Therefore, Bosch provides a guarantee for Bosch power tools, compressed air tools and measuring tools.
The buyer's warranty claims under the sales contract with the seller as well as the buyer's statutory rights are not restricted by this guarantee.
We guarantee these tools according to the following conditions:
We provide warranty in accordance with the following regulations (No. 2 – 7) by means of free rectification of the defects in the tool that are demonstrably due to a material or manufacturing fault within the warranty period.
The warranty period is 24 months, for commercial or professional use or similar use 12 months.
The warranty period begins with the purchase by the first end-user.
The date on the original purchase receipt is decisive.
For all commercial, blue power tools and measuring tools purchased on or after September 1, 2004 (with the exception of high frequency tools, industrial cordless screwdrivers and pneumatic tools), the warranty period will be extended to 36 months if the buyer registers these tools within 4 weeks of the date of purchase.
Battery packs, chargers and included accessories are excluded from this warranty extension.
Registration can only be done online at www.bosch-pt.com/warranty.
The registration receipt, which must be printed out immediately, and the original sales receipt, from which the date of purchase can be determined, will serve as confirmation.
Registration is only possible if the buyer agrees to the storage of the data he enters there.
Excluded from the guarantee are: Parts subject to wear and tear due to use or other natural wear and tear, as well as defects in the tool that are due to wear and tear due to use or other natural use, abnormal environmental conditions, improper operating conditions, overload or lack of maintenance or care.
Defects caused by the use of accessories, add-on or replacement parts which are not Bosch original parts.
Tools that have been changed or added to.
Minor deviations from the specified condition that are insignificant for the value and usability of the tool.
The rectification of the defect recognised by us as a guarantee obligation is carried out in such a way that we repair the defective tool free of charge at our discretion or replace it with a defect-free tool (possibly also a successor model).
Replaced tools or parts become our property.
When did the deadline run out?
According to the Distance Selling Act, I have a right to withdraw for one month.
The LokSound 5 is the most important member of the LokSound family.
By combining the digital decoder and sound module on a printed circuit board, we achieve dimensions of only 30mm x15.5mm and can therefore be installed in almost every H0 and 0 gauge locomotive.
LokSound 5 decoders are offered with all common interfaces and always come with a 11x15mm large "sugar cube" speaker and a sound capsule kit.
Like all family members, the LokSound5 is a true multi-protocol decoder.
It also supports the DCC data format, as well as Motorola®, Selectrix® and M4.
In the DCC format, 14 to 128 speed steps are as self-evident as 2- and 4-digit addresses and up to 32 functions.
Thanks to RailComPlus®, the decoders automatically connect to a suitable digital central unit.
It supports all DCC programming modes, and with suitable central units, CV values can be read on the main line thanks to RailCom®.
For centrals that can only program the CVs from 1-255, there are auxiliary registers.
Motorola® users benefit from up to 28 steps at 255 addresses.
Three more Motorola addresses enable the triggering of 16 functions.
A built-in programming mode also makes it possible to reprogram the venerable Control Unit 6021.
The M4 protocol permits automatic login to mfx®-compatible central units.
The LokSound 5 decoder recognises Märklin® brake tracks as well as ZIMO® HLU brake instructions or the Lenz® ABC system.
It is also possible to brake with DCC brake units or with direct current.
In addition, it also stops at a Selectrix® brake diode.
An ABC Pendolino automatic system allows the pendolino to automatically travel between two stations.
The LokSound 5 decoder can be used on analogue DC and AC layouts.
After my coupon is not extended with leniency because of a complaint that never reached me, I will cancel my order worth approximately
Remove #NUMBER#€ from my cart and order elsewhere, where customer-friendliness is a priority and I don't have to type my fingers off just to achieve nothing!!
What am I supposed to do with this number then?
Due to Omicron: Johnson wants to promote booster vaccination
There are always new Omikron cases that are of concern to politicians and scientists in Great Britain.
Therefore, all eligible adults in England are to receive a vaccination offer by New Year's Day.
London - British Prime Minister Boris Johnson wants to speed up the booster vaccination campaign in the face of rapidly rising Omikron numbers.
Every adult in England should have the opportunity to receive a booster dose by the end of the year, as long as it has been at least three months since their second dose, Johnson said in a pre-recorded video message to his compatriots on Sunday evening.
So far, the target date was the end of January.
The UK Government will provide additional support to speed up vaccination programmes in the devolved nations of Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland.
We are facing an emergency in the face of the Omicron variant, which is why it is urgently necessary to strengthen vaccination protection, said Johnson.
The good news is that the level of protection can be increased again with a third vaccine dose.
"Get boosted now," Johnson said.
Another 1,239 Omicron cases were recorded in the UK on Sunday, bringing the total to 3,137.
Compared with the previous day, this was an increase of a healthy 65 percent. dpa
will the full amount be reimbursed from the purchase price when collected?
I am for everyone introducing themselves with pronouns
I submitted an application.
Today, the invitation to a conversation came via email.
I want to respond to the email.
Unfortunately, the name is not "Peter," but a somewhat more complicated name.
I Googled it and it's either a man or a woman depending on where they're from culturally.
**I have no idea how to write the email now.
Can someone please help me?
** I'm a foreigner and I don't want to tread on an official's toes either.
Conclusion: everyone should introduce themselves with pronouns.
I have a total of 5 books on it.
4 of them go.
Only the one I bought today doesn't work
Evidently, the chair had an undisclosed defect at the time of sale.
How can such a damage to a cushion occur otherwise after 9 months?
Only on #PRS_ORG#.
However, this has been the case for about
Not more than 14 days.
Therefore, I have always bought the last books through the website and then read them on #PRS_ORG#.
I bought 6 #PRS_ORG# but wanted to buy 8.
But there were none.
Now they are available again and I would like you to please add 2 chairs to my order and charge me for them.
[CW] The feeling when I can't help.
Content warning: I'm going to write about domestic violence in some detail here.
I just need to get something off my chest.
I (21) come into contact with victims (and perpetrators) of domestic violence more frequently due to my job.
An issue that really gnaws at me and unfortunately happens all too often is that many victims do not allow themselves to be helped, or think we cannot help them.
I am aware that we cannot do everything and that it is not perfect.
But there are not many things in my job that move me more than when I can't do anything in such situations.
I see the bruises, the blood, the desperate eyes...
But even in a conversation under four eyes, with the perpetrator far out of sight and hearing, I cannot reach everyone.
I don't know what the reason is, maybe it's fear, fear of retaliation, fear of leaving the familiar social environment, fear of taking the children out of it.
What I always try to make clear to everyone, sometimes even very close to tears, is that everyone deserves to be able to live without violence.
I want all women to know that they don't have to just put up with violence.
I often wish I could help in any way... I know I can't.
However, it will never get easier.
Please, always remember that you deserve to live without violence, that is so incredibly important.
"Arcane" on Netflix: What is the series about "League of Legends"?
A lot of fantasy, a lot of complicated names, and a breathtaking look: "Arcane", the series from the "League of Legends" video game universe, recently started on Netflix.
Why are we looking forward to the already announced two seasons?
Basketball-Bundesliga: Derby disaster for the MHP Riesen Ludwigsburg at the Merlins Crailsheim
At least the youngster Johannes Patrick could be relied on.
Nothing again: For the second time in less than three months, the Giants lost in Crailsheim - and how!
Ahead of the game, Ludwigsburg's coach John Patrick looked back on the cup defeat in early October against the Hakro Merlins Crailsheim and said, "We still have some anger in our bellies."
After the game, however, it did not subside - but rather increased in the face of the 61:72 (28:38) defeat in the basketball Bundesliga.
More than the bare result, though, it was the manner of the performance that was so disappointing.
As an example, a statistic is given that expresses the entire dilemma: The three-point percentage was just 13 percent, 4 hits (all of them by the young Johannes Patrick) in 31 attempts - any questions?
John Patrick provided the answer: "After the win in Tenerife, we just weren't focused enough, and didn't implement what we had trained".
That is, to move the ball.
His counterpart, Sebastian Gleim, reacted completely differently: "It was a great game to win against Ludwigsburg for the second time", said the happy coach.
"It felt like 10,000 people."
On Saturday, only 750 visitors were allowed in the Hohenlohe arena, but they got their money's worth.
Not least also because of BBL top scorer T.J. Shorts, who scored 22 points and steered the game of his team.
"He is the best playmaker I have ever trained," praised Gleim.
While on Patrick's team, the top performers such as Jordan Hulls (0 points) and Jonah Radebaugh (7) failed across the board.
Only in the last quarter (22:15) did the giants prevent a total disaster and came back up to eight points, after they had already been 39:59 behind.
In addition to Johannes Patrick, Justin Simon scored 12 points.
Fortunately, there isn't much time to argue.
Already on Wednesday (7 p.m.) the Giants will host the Skyliners Frankfurt, in front of a maximum of 750 spectators in Ludwigsburg.
We used to have a different email address, but I changed it.
Yes, I signed up a few months ago.
Unfortunately, all warranty claims were rejected.
We got legal advice and wrote to them again.
We registered half a year ago.
Always like a freshly laid egg: Max Raabe turns 59
He manages to captivate his audience with new interpretations of songs from the 1920s and 1930s.
He is currently on tour with the programme "Guten Tag, liebes Glück" - if he is allowed to perform.
In fact, Max Raabe wanted to celebrate his birthday on the stage in Leipzig this Sunday.
But nothing comes of it.
The planned concert has been moved to May 2022 - "by order of the authorities" to contain the corona virus.
Other performances that he had planned for the Advent season will also have to be cancelled for the time being, as it says on the website of the singer, who turns 59 today, and his musicians (www.palast-orchester.de).
From January, the artists want to catch up on the dates they had to postpone in 2020 due to the pandemic.
Max Raabe was born on 12 December 1962 in Lünen in North Rhine-Westphalia. As a teenager, he sang a lot and with great pleasure.
He studied opera singing in Berlin, and in 1986, together with fellow students, he founded the Palast Orchestra.
Since then, the baritone has established himself with his repertoire of schlagers and chansons in the style of the Comedian Harmonists.
He has won many awards.
His live album from the MTV Unplugged series (2019) reached - just like his successful album "Für Frauen ist das kein Problem" (2013) - second place in the charts.
He has made it from the niche to the mainstream.
Always elegantly dressed, with his blonde hair slicked back and paying attention to etiquette, Max Raabe is now an indispensable part of the current German-speaking music scene.
Since 2020, he has been touring with the program "Guten Tag, liebes Glück". dpa
Hello #NAME#, is it also possible to get a small sample piece of the furniture wood in advance?
It will be added to existing furniture and so we will be able to check beforehand whether it fits in terms of colour
It still doesn't work, I can only long for the cover, but not turn the pages.
Federal Minister of Construction, Klara Geywitz: Expropriation does not create a new apartment
The new Federal Minister of Construction Klara Geywitz (SPD) has spoken out against the expropriation of large housing companies, as demanded in a referendum in Berlin.
"With an expropriation, not a single new apartment is created, only the ownership structure changes," said Geywitz in an interview with the "Tagesspiegel" (Sunday).
My aim is to give tenants peace of mind that their rent will remain affordable for years to come.
By the way, a colourful mix of, for example, private landlords, co-operatives or housing associations is the best protection against the formation of a monopoly.
In Berlin, the coalition of SPD, Greens and Left Party will set up an expert commission to deal with the result of the referendum.
However, if the situation does not ease, Geywitz is not ruling out talks with the FDP in the traffic-light coalition about further tightening of the rental law.
The coalition agreement provides for a rent cap until 2029, a limitation of rent increases in tight housing markets and the expansion of the rent ceiling.
I will talk to the Justice Minister to implement this as quickly as possible.
If the rental market does not ease up, "we will talk with our coalition partners about further steps," emphasized the SPD politician.
Hello, I wanted to order something and after a few days I noticed that I forgot the last step of payment.
Unfortunately, the product is no longer available.
Do they know when it will be back in stock?
Or whether it will ever come back at all?
#PRS_ORG# with storage space (180 x #NUMBER# cm),
Voucher sounds great
Then I redeem it myself when I place a new order.
Thank you for the quick clarification!
If the lamp is sent in March, how long does shipping itself take?
I have already cut myself on the finger
That is absolute cheek
At least 100 people killed by tornadoes in Kentucky
A devastating storm system has spawned a number of tornadoes across the United States.
Kentucky alone could have more than 100 fatalities.
The pictures from there remind one of a war zone.
In the night to Saturday, several tornadoes in the USA caused severe damage and may have claimed up to one hundred fatalities.
The storms left a roughly 200-mile-long swath of destruction, mainly in the state of Kentucky.
Its governor, Andy Beshear, said after visiting the disaster area that everything was gone where the tornado had ripped through.
Houses, shops, government buildings - just gone.
Parts of industrial installations, roofs are in the trees.
It's hard to imagine that it's even possible.
He expects up to 100 deaths in the state of Kentucky alone, and the official numbers are rising by the hour.
Hi, I just saw that #NAME# display is sold out.
That is very unfortunate.
Is it still being produced?
Or has it been completely removed from the range?
Is it possible to order this showcase in another country?
When will you check in?
If delivery cannot be made to my apartment, I have to cancel the order!
I understand, but can I now order the ceiling and have it delivered to Germany, which is in the shopping cart?
I had returned an item via the contact form or submitted a return and wanted to ask if it had arrived or was being processed, as I had not yet received a confirmation.
Firms pay vaccination bonuses and change slogans
While the federal government continues to reject the proposals for a vaccination bonus, companies in Austria have taken the initiative themselves and are offering their employees cash bonuses for vaccination.
In doing so, they are in line with the social partners ÖGB and the Chamber of Commerce, who called for financial incentives for vaccination today.
Changing advertising slogans to vaccination calls - after the German example - is also supposed to increase willingness to be vaccinated against Corona.
He has changed to a company that he has gossiped about.
That doesn't make his situation any better than yours.
Wait and drink tea.
It has been a year.
After all, he hasn't apparently tied himself to his old job and has been looking for something else.
You can do that, too.
And that he didn't like you back then: well, it doesn't matter.
He didn't like his job anyway.
There are too many variables.
Please take the cancellation.
That will then be legally relevant.
I take a screenshot.
Good day - I'm interested in the Boone dining table, white.
Is there also a large size of 230cm?
We carry all Smeg kitchen appliances and the corresponding accessories in our online shop kitchenpoint.de.
We generally check the quality and completeness of your order.
Smeg's new coffee machine will bring freshly ground coffee to your kitchen or office.
The simple and reduced design, the plastic surface in matt colours in combination with the matt brushed stainless steel front make the new SMEG coffee machine with milk frother a design object.
In line with the reduced design, all functions such as grind setting and water quantity, as well as the choice between espresso, americano, ristretto or a mild coffee can be selected with just four buttons.
With the steam lance, coffee with milk and milk foam specialties can also be prepared.
Help with first own campaign
Greetings, Boron!
I am currently running a group of 4 friends through the adventure Over the Griffen Pass, and I would like to seamlessly introduce my heroes into a campaign written specifically for the players.
We are playing DSA 5.
The big arc is done, the villains and their motivations written, the individual acts thought up, and now I am writing the introduction adventure and already stumble over my own feet during the first encounter.
The premise is that the heroes are to bring a wagon of grain from Gratenfels to a small village near Lake Thuran.
That's where the rest of the story will develop.
Some miles from the village, the heroes are ambushed by a group of goblins, who lure them into an ambush.
I want to give the player characters the opportunity to resolve the confrontation in different ways: persuade, act, threaten, see the danger early, whatever the players come up with.
Group size: 8 ordinary goblins, 2 with spears, 6 armed with bows and sabres
If undetected, the Goblins lay in wait for the heroes in a hollow way and flank the wagon with three archers each left and right, while two with spears stop the wagon.
Should it come to a battle and the heroes are defeated, I have two solutions
1. The heroes are all found unconscious and healed by the village schoolmaster's son, a half-elf.
The cart is, of course, gone.
2. If a defeat is unavoidable, this half-elf steps in with two of his servants and comes to the hero's aid in battle.
The cart is still there, everything is great.
How do you feel about Deus ex Machina from Solution 2?
Is the encounter too much of an introduction to the adventure?
The group of Goblins will later play a crucial role, so they are not just cannon fodder.
EDIT: wow, I didn't expect so many answers, especially not so many great suggestions and tips.
I'm sure I'll take a lot of your ideas on board and I've got more confidence in my narratives now too.
I took the lamp apart again.
And again, they've been stuck together.
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work.
That's why I'd still like to send them back.
Can you then bring the return tickets, then I can pack the lamp and bring it to the #PRS_ORG#.
Save shipping costs and time – and help the environment at the same time!
If you need more than one article, please click "Pay now" only when you have all the articles in your cart.
Thus, the combined shipping is automatically calculated and you will receive everything in one package.
By doing this, you save yourself the trouble of multiple purchases/payments and the environment will thank you, as no unnecessary shipping materials and unnecessary fuel for the delivery of multiple packages will be used.
Faster shipping with DHL, DPD and Deutsche Post!
As a rule, we send your package, if payment is received by 2.00 p.m., on the same working day.
To make sure that your parcel arrives as soon as possible, please make sure that your address is complete and that your name is on your mailbox and your doorbell.
Would you like us to send your parcel to a parcel station?
Then please select DHL, as only DHL is allowed to deliver to DHL parcel stations.
We will send you an email with the tracking number, if you selected DHL or DPD as the sender.
Therefore, you can already check from around 10:00 p.m. where your package is.
Your satisfaction is our goal - all five stars count!
If you are satisfied with us, we would be happy if you would rate us positively and give all five stars in the detailed ratings.
Should it ever happen that not everything went to your complete satisfaction, we would be grateful if you contacted us before posting a review.
Only then do we have the chance to do everything we can to make you happy.
We had nothing to do with the chair.
All of a sudden, the rift was there
I just sat on it
Here, the lower part, i.e. the part with storage space, was damaged.
Will everything be picked up again or just the storage space?
I'm fed up with Sky Sports F1
Hello dear F1 fans, over the course of the season, the quality on German Sky has deteriorated more and more, so I want to vent a little with this post.
First of all today, the broadcast was interrupted in the middle of the F2 race to start the F1 pre-race coverage on time.
Although the schedule was far behind the plan due to the delayed start and the start accident, they could still have shown the last (planned) ten minutes and the championship decision (!).
Apparently, however, it is the case that F1 has priority for legal reasons, and therefore everything else must be restricted, so Sky DE had no choice here.
Still stupid, especially since Sky UK has continued to broadcast the race.
Nevertheless a little praise: the commentator Olivier Zwartyes has accompanied the difficult situation around the serious accident well.
Then, in the F1 there was once again a lack of knowledge of the rules by the commentators Sascha Roos and Ralf Schumacher, so that both did not know that one is allowed to change the tyres under a red flag.
Although there have been similar situations in Imola, Baku and Silverstone this year, both only came to the conclusion that Verstappen was allowed to change tyres when there were corresponding radio messages on the subject to Hamilton.
At Sky UK as well as RTL, both commentators knew immediately that there was this possibility for Verstappen.
I believe such elementary rules should simply be known if you commentate on F1 for a pay-TV channel.
It's also not the first time that now, according to the rules, it is possible or prescribed to guess, both have simply constant uncertainties in the subject of the rules.
In general, I don't like Roos's stilted commentary style, but I acknowledge that it's a matter of taste.
But even Heiko Wasser of RTL is better than that in my opinion.
Add to that the constant silliness, which makes both of them look simply unprofessional, like ordering coffee from the (equally clueless) reporter Peter Hardenacke or "UuuuuHD" from Ralf Schumacher.
The latter in particular causes a lot of trouble in the commentary, which he apparently does not take seriously.
Not least, the advertising just takes over at Sky, in the run-off round Sky is the only channel that goes into advertising, as one can hear on F1TV, where only the German audio track without commentary must do directly after the race.
Neither ServusTV nor the ORF are doing this.
These two channels also make less advertising in the training than Sky, and that as a Free-TV channel.
While one must praise Glock and Baumgartner for their work, this alone does not make me overlook the disadvantages.
The rest of the Sky Sports F1 schedule is also very thin and full of repeats.
Overall, Sky is really the worst German-speaking channel that broadcasts the F1.
Unironically, RTL does a better job on the four races that they are still allowed to broadcast.
So, in any case, the brilliant F1 season is much less fun than it would be with a reasonable broadcaster.
I'd like to hear your opinion.
Here's one: #PRS_ORG# pendant light, brass and multi-coloured glass x 1
Hello, I have an article that was supposed to be delivered last week and it still hasn't been delivered.
I've reached out to the chat twice and haven't heard anything.
The First Lady told me it was going out on Monday, the Second Lady told me yesterday that she was going to check and send an email and she never responded.
Hello, I ordered two #PRS_ORG# on 12.12.19.
One of them has already shown a defect after a relatively short time (the material has a hole in the front part of the chair).
I ask for your support.
Air pumps are great for providing additional oxygen to an aquarium.
It is also possible to operate a filter system using an air lift.
This series is offered by us in 3 variants.
Look at the table at the end of the offer.
There, you can see the performance in comparison.
If the pumps are strong enough, you can run entire systems with them.
If you have a large aquarium, pumps with 2 or more outlets are suitable, so that you can connect several outlets.
The MK series has one, two or four outlets, depending on the model. A fan pump can also be used to set an accent in the aquarium, e.g. with an air curtain (available in our shop) or with a decoration, which will turn the air bubbles into a function.
Here you would call a treasure chest, a shell or something like that.
The MK series has a special, sound-insulated construction and ensures low operating noise.
The installation is very easy.
The fan pump is connected to an extractor fan or similar via a 4/6 mm air hose...and you can get started.
The fan pump should be the same, or higher than the water level and attached on the outside.
If the fan pump is lower than the water level, a check valve should be placed in between.
Simply cut the air tube and put the valve in between.
This would prevent the water from running back through the pump and into the pool...
If the fan pump is mounted outdoors, it should be covered like other air pumps and protected from moisture.
MK series pumps are pure power packages that use little energy
Even though we indicate a processing time of 3 days here on eBay, we pack every day and the packages are also picked up every day here.
If everything is going well on the way, it goes very fast.
We just want to be a little bit preventative, so that no one is upset, just because it took a little bit longer.
It would be so, not everyone has understanding for all the employees who also work in the logistics sector...of course, here, Corona doesn't stop.
Please don't give a bad rating just because the delivery is delayed. This is solely due to the parcel services.
Of course people like to have a go at these services, even though we're saying at the moment...they've got it pretty tough
This is also very different from region to region.
Do not be evil, stay healthy and we all hope that better times will come again.
How long does it take to order the yellow ones with and without armrests?
Can you also order your legs in light here?
Amazon founder Bezos sends astronaut daughter and TV presenter into space
The daughter of the first American in space, a TV presenter and four other passengers took a short trip into space.
They were transported on Saturday by the "New Shepard" rocket system of the company Blue Origin, founded by Amazon founder Jeff Bezos.
The take-off and landing of the approximately ten-minute flight took place in the west of the US state of Texas.
Under a bright blue sky, Bezos personally welcomed the freshly minted astronauts upon their return.
"Welcome back," said Bezos, dressed in a blue space suit, as he opened the hatch to the capsule.
As friends, family members and Blue Origin employees cheered, the six passengers climbed out one by one and hugged the Amazon founder.
According to Blue Origin, they were in the air for 10 minutes and 13 seconds and reached an altitude of 107 kilometers.
74-year-old Laura Shepard Churchley, daughter of Alan Shepard (1923-1998), who flew into space as a NASA astronaut in 1961, and 50-year-old TV host Michael Strahan were honored guests of the company, the other four passengers had paid for their tickets: space engineer Dylan Taylor, investor Evan Dick, technology entrepreneur Lane Bess, and his son Cameron.
Blue Origin did not reveal how much each ticket cost.
After the brief flight, Laura Shepard Churchley remembered her father's mission.
He had to work hard and do everything himself.
She said she was just along for the ride, the 74-year-old said with a laugh.
Michael Strahan was also enthusiastic.
He would love to go back to space again, said the moderator.
"New Shepard" flies up to 100 kilometres high
The New Shepard rocket system flies largely autonomously.
The capsule separated from the rocket during the flight and reached a height of around 100 kilometers above the Earth, with a period of weightlessness, before the reusable object was slowed by large parachutes and landed.
The Fédération Aéronautique Internationale and many other experts see 100 kilometers above the Earth as the boundary to space, but there is no binding international regulation.
It was already the third crewed all-out flight of Blue Origin: In the first one in July, Amazon founder Bezos himself was on board, along with his brother Mark, an 82-year-old former US pilot and an 18-year-old Dutchman.
The second, in October, featured the 90-year-old Canadian actor William Shatner, who became world famous with his role as "Captain Kirk" in "Star Trek", as well as the former Nasa engineer Chris Boshuizen, the entrepreneur Glen de Vries and the deputy head of Blue Origin, Audrey Powers.
Critics have accused Bezos and Blue Origin of pushing ahead with the business of space tourism largely without scientific research interests for the good of humanity and without consideration for the climate.
With a push of a button, you can easily choose whether your "Smart Stone" should light up permanently in one colour or play through its entire colour spectrum.
When set to change colour, the light stone retains a light colour for approximately one minute before gently transitioning to the next decorative tone.
The solid design of the "Smart Stone" light makes it suitable for year-round outdoor use.
In snowy conditions, its light even looks particularly good – only with shortened light duration is to be expected, as soon as the days get shorter.
In winter, please make sure that no snow affects the function of the solar module.
"Smart Stone" uses a NiMh battery in the common mignon ("AA") format, which can be replaced if necessary.
A suitable replacement battery can be ordered from our online shop, thus extending the life of your decorative light even further.
A high-gloss effect spray that makes smooth surfaces look like chrome.
Suitable for all smooth surfaces, in particular for the design of rims, wheel trims and paintable plastic parts with appropriate pre-treatment.
With this product, DUPLI-COLOR is offering a wipe- and weather-proof chrome spray for the first time.
The optimal effect is achieved on a black background, e.g. by priming with DUPLI-COLOR TUNING Effect Primer.
Available as a single dose and in a set including an effect primer and a dust-binding cloth for the optimal preparation of the paint job.
For use on metal, wood, glass, paintable hard plastics, stone.
Perfect, that's right. Do I need to add anything else?
All they need is the tracking number on my mail?
Someone who works in biochemistry or has studied biochemistry
I'm currently studying biochemistry in the first semester and I actually find the subject quite interesting and I don't mind being in the lab (I have already completed the inorganic chemistry practicum).
Of course, I had already researched career opportunities before I started my studies, but at the time, I also thought that I definitely wanted to study up to my doctorate.
At the moment, however, I have doubts, especially about my career prospects.
On the one hand (Studycheck, etc.) one always hears about great career opportunities and the profession is totally in demand, and on the other hand one always hears about unemployed biologists and incredibly badly paid jobs.
Therefore, I would really like to know:
1) What are you working on at the moment?
2) Are you satisfied with your work/salary?
3) What did you study/ what training did you do?
4) Would you do it all again?
Thank you for your answers!
I'm really unsure at the moment, and I'm thinking about possibly dropping out of university in 2022 and doing an apprenticeship as a specialist computer scientist.
If you have any experience with this, feel free to share it as well :)
Extra stress before holidays and public holiday weekends
This came up for me last week.
I had to use my long weekend now to relax from it.
That's why they've only just added a post now.
Not only before major holidays, such as Christmas, there is a lot of stress here in the business.
Apparently, it also applies to holidays plus bridge days.
This is how it was: Last week was the Assumption of Mary, which is called "Auffahrt" by us in Switzerland.
On Friday, the vast majority of people and businesses will take a bridge day, making it semi-official.
A long 4-day weekend was looming last week.
So, what happened last week?
Stress everywhere.
Lots of e-mails that absolutely had to be sent before the bank holiday, here an order, there an order, everything *absolutely* before the long weekend.
Because... yes, because?
Because "next week then" sounds like too much time, and that must not be the case?
Or because people really want to do as much in a shortened week as in a normal one?
Not only was I stressed out on Wednesday, but I was also really annoyed.
What's this self-righteousness about holidays?
Why do we have public holidays if we are not allowed to enjoy them properly?!
The stress did not come from above, the colleagues were all very independent.
My question is simply: are we the only ones, the Swiss?
Is this our reformed-evangelical way?
Or is it known in the north as well?
Yvonne Catterfeld is looking forward to Christmas in Thuringia
Yvonne Catterfeld (42) is looking forward to Christmas in her native Thuringia - but she doesn't have any gifts yet.
"The good thing is, even if there is no snow in Erfurt, you can simply drive to Ilmenau in the Thuringian Forest", said the actress and singer at Hit Radio FFH.
She will get into the holiday spirit by baking and crafting with her son.
"I love it," Catterfeld said.
Before the contemplative days, however, she still has a lot to do: "For the first time, I don't have any presents yet, I have to get going now."
NEKTON-Bio supports a smooth moult and feather regrowth.
NEKTON-Bio contains all of the essential vitamins, amino acids, minerals, trace elements and 200,000 µg of biotin/kg.
NEKTON-Bio gives the bird a smooth and shiny plumage.
The vast majority of feather damage in birds kept in captivity is due to nutritional errors alone.
Since the plumage consists of a protein-rich substance, a particularly rich and balanced protein-based diet is required for the formation of a flawless plumage.
For a functioning metabolism, the daily diet must contain sufficient vitamins, minerals and trace elements.
Much of the animal losses that occur during molting are due to inadequate or imbalanced protein intake and/or inadequate supply of vitamins and minerals.
In the composition of NEKTON-Bio, the unfavourable ratio of amino acids in most plant-based feeds is explicitly taken into account and balanced.
During the application of NEKTON-Bio, no other vitamin preparation should be administered.
NECTON-Bio is water-soluble in cold water and can be administered very easily via the drinking water or via the soft food.
Thanks, I found it
Still not working, unfortunately.
DDR-Handarbeitsmodell Altbau E-Lok E 95 03 DRG/DR, the locomotive was in use in Silesia and Central Germany, the very rare locomotive probably comes from the conversion proposal of the model railway ME magazine 11/1968, used with play marks and missing parts see photos, function good, The E 95 class is a heavy freight electric locomotive of the Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft (DRG), which was designed for the traction of heavy coal trains in the Silesian network, possibly the kit also comes from the small series company ZSCHUTSCHKE and BACHMANN.
One locomotive is in the DB Museum in Halle (Saale) and is operational
In 1924, Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft commissioned AEG to submit proposals for an electric locomotive that should be able to haul 2,200-ton coal trains and 530-ton passenger trains at 45 km/h on this route.
The maximum speed was 65 km/h.
In March 1926, therefore, the DRG determined the delivery as a 1'Co+Co1' locomotive with Tatzlager drive by AEG for the mechanical part, and the Siemens-Schuckertwerke for the electrical part.
Between December 1927 and June 1928, six locomotives were delivered, which received the operating numbers E 95 01–06.
They all survived the Second World War and found themselves on the territory of the future GDR afterwards.
In 1946, the locomotives arrived in the Soviet Union as reparation goods.
They returned to Germany until November 1952.
At the Reichsbahn repair shop in Dessau, it was determined that all six locomotives could be refurbished.
[4] As the re-electrification of the mid-German network progressed, there was a growing need for locomotives for heavy freight train service. In 1959, the three locomotives E 95 01 to E 95 03 were refurbished, with the other machines serving as spare parts.
Initially, the E 04, E 44 and E 94, which were available in greater numbers, were preferred.
Only when it became apparent that the processing number of the E 94 could not be increased any further did the E 95 come into focus for processing.
[4] First, the locomotives were stationed at the Leipzig-Wahren railway depot.
They came to the Halle P depot in 1960.
They were mostly used in their own circulation plan in front of coal trains from Geiseltal in the direction of Halle, Leipzig and Erfurt.
With increasing age, the complex controls on the locomotives became a problem.
It was often the case that shooters got stuck while changing gears.
Then the co-driver on this locomotive had to use a hammer and a wooden wedge to loosen the guards during the journey.
Damage to the drive motors was common, leading to months-long outages for the locomotive.
[5] As there were enough new-build locomotives available at the end of the 1960s and a significant expansion of electrical operation was not planned at that time, the Reichsbahn was able to do without old locomotives and most of the offshoots, so that the E 95 was taken out of service.
In addition, the Deutsche Reichsbahn only wanted to operate electric locomotives with one person, which, due to the aforementioned difficulties with the machines and the visibility from the driver's cab, would have caused problems in train operation.
[5] After mid-1969, the E 95 02 and E 95 03 were taken out of service, and the E 95 01 was the last to follow. It was taken out of service on 5 October 1970.
The proposed new designation 255 001 was therefore never used.
All the locomotives, except E 95 02, have been dismantled.
The E 95 02 was set up as a switch heating system at Halle Central Station as a replacement for the future museum locomotive E 77 10.
It took some time for the officials at the Reichsbahn to be convinced that the E 95 was worthy of preservation as a museum locomotive.
In 1979, the first external restoration of the locomotive began with the aim of being able to present it at a vehicle show in the RAW Dessau.
[5] Since then, it has been part of the Dresden Transport Museum as a non-operational museum locomotive.
In 1986, the internal completion of the locomotive was completed.
The locomotive is preserved at the DB Museum in Halle (Saale).
Since 1995, employees of the Traditionsgemeinschaft Bw Halle P have been working on the operational restoration of the locomotive.
In April 2015, the locomotive could first be presented at an exhibition at the museum depot in Arnstadt with new internal and external paintwork, where the transformers were inspected and five drive motors are operational.
The locomotives were used on the Silesian Mountain Railway and its branch lines until 1945, where they proved their worth due to their reliable drive and low maintenance requirements.
In February 1945, the machines were relocated to Leipzig for the central German network.
Its main area of deployment was initially Silesia.
Handwork model H0 in OVP, function good, it is necessary to carry out optical work on the locomotive in one's own work, dusty, with play traces, cellar smell !!!, very rare handwork model, very small edition - perhaps the kit also comes from the small series company ZSCHUTSCHKE and BACHMANN
The packaging may have labels and storage marks.
Yes, the F-parts are
I received a bed from you.
However, there were problems with one part.
The middle beam is held up by two feet. Unfortunately, these are too narrow and the beam cannot be mounted on the feet.
What do we do now?
I can't put the bed together.
The middle bar is held by two feet, which are unfortunately produced incorrectly.
The middle beam does not fit into the intended holder.
So I get new ones sent to me.
When will they be sent away?
No, no flats.
These are, according to the assembly instructions, the right ones in shape, they were just too narrow
But that doesn't matter.
As long as they serve their purpose
They're not flat with me
Could I get these sent to me?
Hello #NAME#, should I explain the problem to you again?
Residential fire with two minor injuries and high damage
Two people have been slightly injured in a house fire in Upper Bavaria.
Moreover, an estimated damage in the six-digit euro range has occurred, as the police announced on Sunday.
The fire had apparently spread from a carport to the adjacent house in Kinsau (Landsberg am Lech district).
According to reports, two residents were taken to hospital with minor smoke inhalation on Sunday.
The exact cause of the fire was unknown, but the police did not suspect arson.
The criminal investigation department of Fürstenfeldbruck has taken over the further investigations.
But it won't arrive until much later
And I have to pay shipping costs again
To debunk fake news - Biontech CEO publishes vaccination photo
Uğur Şahin posted a photo of his first vaccination in early 2021 on the social network "LinkedIn"
So far, Biontech CEO Uğur Sahin had not publicly commented on his vaccination status.
Now, the entrepreneur published a photo showing his corona vaccination.
A friend's illness prompted him to do so, Şahin said.
The CEO and co-founder of the Mainz-based company Biontech, Uğur Şahin, has published a photo showing him receiving a vaccination against the coronavirus.
On social media, false information circulated that I had not been vaccinated.
In fact, my wife and I have received 3 doses of the Biontech-Pfizer vaccine," wrote Şahin on Friday in a post on the "LinkedIn" network.
"For months, friends have been urging me to post a photo of myself getting a shot to combat these false rumors."
So far, he has refused, because the communication should not be about himself.
But a call last week has changed his mind: "I was deeply saddened when I learned that an old school friend of mine is currently fighting for his life.
He is fighting a severe case of Covid-19 and has been on a ventilator for three weeks.
The school friend and his family were not vaccinated, wrote Şahin.
He didn't ask why.
"The most common cause, however, appears to be fear, which is often stoked by misinformation and mistrust."
Fear is difficult to combat with facts, sometimes it is better to share personal experiences.
An interview with Deutsche Welle is circulating on the internet, in which Uğur Şahin says he has not been vaccinated.
However, the video was created in December 2020, as was clarified by Deutsche Welle itself.
"Currently, I am not legally allowed to get the vaccine myself," Şahin said at the time.
In Germany, there is a prioritisation when it comes to the vaccination with the vaccine.
The prioritisation has long since been lifted - and the Biontech CEO has been vaccinated three times, according to his own statements.
Fire in substation: tens of thousands of people without electricity
On Friday evening, the lights went out in several municipalities in North Rhine-Westphalia: no more electricity, and in many cases probably no heating either.
A fire had disabled a transformer station.
After a fire with severe damage to a substation, tens of thousands of people in the Rhein-Sieg district of North Rhine-Westphalia had to do without electricity for around 24 hours.
On Friday evening, the fire left 41,000 affected residents and residents in several communities in the dark.
The energy supplier Westnetz reported that numerous emergency generators were in operation on Saturday until the large-scale disruption was finally completely resolved late in the evening.
Firefighters and helpers from the THW provided support in the municipalities.
Authorities offered care places in schools and called for help from neighbours.
The utility thanked those affected for their patience and the helpers for their efforts.
We are very aware that the last 24 hours have brought significant disruption.
We would also like to thank the affected municipalities, the district, the fire services and the THW for their tireless efforts," said Florian Witt, head of the Primary Technology department, in a statement on Saturday evening.
Repairing the damage will take a few more days, as the Westnetz fitters were only able to temporarily put some of the lines back in operation, he explained.
The fire was caused by a technical defect, according to the company.
Current is flowing again
According to Westnetz, the fire that broke out at around 7:15 p.m. on Friday severely damaged parts of the 10,000-volt switchgear at the Neunkirchen-Seelscheid substation.
There, extensive cleaning and repair work is required.
At the same time, a connection to a 30,000-volt voltage level has been created.
With the help of this bypass, the power supply is restored.
Since 6 p.m. on Saturday, more than 21,000 people in Much and Ruppichteroth have had electricity again.
Another 20,000 inhabitants of Neunkirchen-Seelscheid were gradually connected after 9.30 p.m.
Since 9:15 p.m., the last people affected by the outage have also had electricity.
Over 80 fitters from Westnetz and partner companies were involved.
After setting up emergency power supply for important buildings on Saturday afternoon, the authorities had also called for assistance from neighbors.
"Now it is important that citizens care for older people or people living alone in their neighbourhood, and let the local fire stations know if help is needed," explained District Administrator Sebastian Schuster (CDU) after a crisis meeting.
When setting up and operating emergency power generators, the focus was especially on the residents of nursing homes.
In addition, according to the authorities, temporary care places were set up in schools for those people who could not take care of themselves or who required medical devices or medical care.
Guten Tag!
Unfortunately, the ceiling in Germany is sold out.
Can I buy them from you and pay in euros?
It is the day blanket #PRS_ORG# in blue-green.
I hope you also have a nice day and stay healthy ♡
I can't, however, mount the undercarriage on the table top.
This is Custom #NAME#.
There are 3 versions of it.
We were looking for those with table tops with a diameter of #NUMBER#.
We have 155cm in diameter.
My #PRS_ORG# came today, but I can't push them together to shorten them.
Can you help me with that?
Otherwise I would have to send it back, as it is not suitable for the purpose.
I'll look forward to hearing from you.
Yes, that's really easier!
Then we'll do it that way!
Can you email me the return label?
The repair is now complete.
I had already tried this before the chat.
However, I had not restarted the E-#PRS_ORG# before the purchase.
Should I do it now?
I find such a low reimbursement almost scandalous.
We disagree with this
Nordic Combined: Riiber wins
The German Nordic Combined skiers Fabian Rießle and Julian Schmid sprinted to the podium at the World Cup in Otepää, Estonia.
The duo had to concede once again to the outstanding Norwegian, Jarl Magnus Riiber, who had already started with a large lead after the ski jump.
Return of the order number #NUMBER#
When will the money be returned to my account?
Yes, we have both upgraded and are using version 4.5...
It could be that they have already heard of problems.
I've bought a book directly with my #PRS_ORG#, it seems to be there too.
When I try to open it, I get the message, oops!
This document could not be opened.
If the file is faulty, contact customer service.
As far as I can tell, it's a #PRS_ORG# epub file.
Can they help me?
The chat connection is gone, and now?
I also have to work in between!
To ensure that the paint application is even and clean, you should clean the parts with some soapy water to remove dust, grease and fingerprints, rinse with clear water and dry them.
Before you apply the brush to the model with a new colour for the first time, it is recommended that you practice 2 to 3 strokes.
You can do this on the inside of the parts, which is no longer visible later, or on a yoghurt cup.
The first mark on the part
Hold the brush steady from stroke to stroke.
A light overlap of the paint layers ensures an even surface later on.
Avoid swiping the brush back and forth quickly.
This leads to unrealistically-looking areas.
A model is not a garden fence.
Start with the lighter colors.
Otherwise, the dark ones could shine through later.
Metal tones and metallic colours come at the very end with a separate brush.
Otherwise there can be unsightly metal flakes when they are mixed with normal colours.
Let the painted parts dry for a day before you install them.
The models achieve a true-to-original appearance through the decals, i.e. peel-off pictures.
From national insignia on aircraft, to ship names, to trim and badges on car models, the decals give the model that final touch.
Apply the decals in the correct order while the parts are still accessible.
A plane cockpit can be covered more easily before it is installed in the fuselage.
Time, patience and a steady hand are even more important than the right tools such as scissors, tweezers and a toothpick when applying the stickers.
Cut out each required decal one at a time and set them aside.
Decals are also known as waterslide decals because you briefly wet the back of them with water until the carrier paper turns dark with the moisture.
Then you just slide the picture a little bit off the paper and place the piece on the corresponding place on the model (which you have also moistened in advance).
While you hold the decal in place on the model with a tool, you pull the backing paper to the side.
Attention: always check first that the image is in the right place before sliding it completely off the paper, so that it does not stick to your fingers, crease, or even tear.
Suck up excess water with a household cloth.
Warning: not suitable for children under 3 years
I can only open a book for a short time, once I look at something else then I can't read the book anymore and have to log out and log in again and load the book again and search for the place I was reading up to.
On Saturday, I already communicated with you.
Can I get this by email?
Also for all 3 packages?
Because the lamp came to me in 3 individual packages
Ok, thanks anyway!
Then I will buy elsewhere once the money is back.
But can I get it back without any problems?
Fertility treatment with private health insurance / What is an "insurance case"?
Hello everyone,
We have been in fertility treatment for some time, now when it comes to billing with the private health insurance, they are suddenly standing in our way.
One after the other:
We had applied for the fertility treatment at the PKV in advance and received approval for 3 attempts.
The trials were in no way (e.g. time frame, success, etc.) restricted.
The first attempt led directly to a successful pregnancy and birth and was billed to the private health insurance.
Some time later, we tried to have a second child, and carried out 2 (unsuccessful) attempts, but these were not yet covered by the private health insurance.
We applied again to the private health insurance to cover the costs, and again, we were allowed 3 more attempts.
After some more attempts (we did more attempts than promised, of course, the most expensive ones will be reimbursed by the private health insurance), we submitted the bills to the private health insurance and received the nasty surprise: instead of 5 attempts (2+3), the private health insurance will only reimburse 3 attempts.
The reason: With the pregnancy/birth the other 2 attempts of the first commitment fall away.
The second wish for a child is a new insurance case.
However, according to the terms and conditions, "The insurance event begins with the start of medical treatment and ends when there is no longer a need for treatment."
The questions to the experts in the round here are:
* Who is right, the private health insurance (only 3 attempts will be reimbursed) or us (there are 5 attempts to be reimbursed)?
* Would the private health insurance have had to point out to us that after a birth, further attempts would be lost?
* Is the desire for a second child really a new insurance case?
Infertility (caused by blocked fallopian tubes) is not cured by the first child.
It would be great if the experts here would give their opinion.
Thanks in advance for your help!
Can you please send me the three options via email and tell me how best to reach them
Okay.
We will never order from them again.
When they add up the takings from me and my mate #NAME# (same address) they have obviously lost a good customer.
They can feel free to pass this on to their manager.
That's not competitive.
Yesterday my colleague told me that the refund was initiated and now you're telling me that I have to send the thing back first.
I can't do anything about the fact that the chest of drawers arrives completely damaged at my place
Please see what the colleague wrote in the screenshot
It clearly states that the refund was initiated and I still have not received a refund via #PRS_ORG#
They can tell their manager that they have now lost two regular customers.
My friend has also ordered various pieces of furniture for our apartment via his account.
We will no longer do this.
No, the fault only occurred after a few months.
An office chair must be able to withstand normal use.
Otherwise, they are not allowed to sell it as an office chair.
In addition, the 24-month warranty applies.
No, I am not able to get a different type of packaging.
I will take the wardrobe apart and make it available to the transport company.
Good afternoon, I have a question about your series of #PRS_ORG#
These products are advertised with additional footstools, which unfortunately we cannot find on your website.
Can they help?
Topic of the week: The best low-budget films
There is no universal definition of what exactly a low-budget film is, with exact budget limits.
Wikipedia has this to say about it:
A **low-budget film** or **low-budget movie** is a motion picture shot with little to no funding from a major film studio or private investor.
There are plenty of lists of low-budget films available online, such as on Letterboxd.com.
Do you know any interesting representatives of this category?
What appeals to you about it?
And what do you not like at all?
I am a very good customer of yours, I have already furnished 2 apartments entirely with your furniture.
Asked for the best price for the grey leather Odelle sofa.
The delivery time has now been extended again, is it reliable now?
Thank you
With kind regards,
If there is no telephone number, a chat where you have to wait 30 minutes is not a chat!
Unfortunately, nothing changes in the waiting position...I will give up again soon, because it just doesn't work here.
Hello
"Half victory" against Belarus with high costs for the EU
According to the political expert Raphael Bossong, the EU can announce a "half victory" in the conflict with the Belarusian regime.
However, the costs are very high and mean massive violations of the rights of migrants and refugees at the border of Belarus with Poland and Lithuania," said Bossong to the Evangelical Press Service (epd).
The EU has not solved the confrontation in a sustainable way, explained the researcher from the Berlin Foundation for Science and Politics (SWP).
This state of limbo - Belarus is not quite giving in, but the EU feels like a winner - is likely to continue for some time to come.
The way people at the border are being treated is not in line with the European Convention on Human Rights, ruled Bossong.
Apparently, there is a "growing normalisation of pushbacks" by individual EU governments.
Since the EU as a whole has not decided to oppose it, it is at the expense of fundamental rights.
This development at the same time weakens the cohesion in the Union.
"She apparently can't get her way when a member state sets its mind on doing its own thing," as is currently the case with Poland, which is not even allowing the EU border protection agency Frontex access to the border.
Furthermore, the EU is paying another price for its policy at the border with Belarus, says Bossong: A basic agreement on asylum policy is being made more difficult as the line "border protection, border protection, border protection" has been strengthened.
Another attempt to cross the border
According to Poland's border guard, meanwhile, migrants have again attempted to enter Polish territory via Belarus.
55 migrants were arrested and returned to the border overnight on Sunday, said a spokeswoman for the authority on Sunday.
The Polish officials were pelted with stones by the migrants, near the village of Czeremsza.
One soldier was hit in the face and had to be medically treated by a military doctor, according to reports.
In total, the border protection registered 52 attempts to cross the border within 24 hours.
Already on Friday night, a group of 28 migrants had crossed the border barriers.
Thousands of people from countries like Iraq and Afghanistan have crossed or tried to cross the border between Belarus and the EU in recent months.
The EU accuses Alexander Lukashenko, the ruler in Minsk, of luring them with the prospect of entry into the EU.
Poland and Lithuania have reportedly closed border sections.
The EU has sanctioned Belarus and threatened airlines that bring migrants and refugees into the country.
Moreover, EU commissioners travelled to the people's countries of origin in order to prevent them from leaving.
The most effective element of the EU's response is the pressure on the airlines, said Bossong.
"Here the EU has thrown its market power into the balance and demonstrated its resolve to operate with a heavy hand and extra-territorial sanctions."
Minsk must also take into account internal political costs.
Belarusian society is probably not prepared for the fact that the security apparatus routinely funnels thousands of people through the country.
Mercedes Protests After Controversial Formula 1 Finale
According to Mercedes, Max Verstappen is said to have broken two rules during the race.
Abu Dhabi - After the controversial Formula 1 final in Abu Dhabi, Mercedes have lodged an appeal.
The Silver Arrows suspect two rule breaks in the last Grand Prix of the year.
A protest refers to an alleged infringement by Max Verstappen in the Red Bull in the last safety car phase, when he is said to have overtaken illegally.
A second protest was lodged against the classification at the end of the race.
According to Mercedes, the protocol was not followed according to the rules.
Verstappen had overtaken Lewis Hamilton in the Mercedes in the last round and raced to his first Formula 1 title.
The maneuver occurred shortly after the end of a Safety Car phase, during which the Dutchman had overtaken the car in front of him.
I will check that.
I'll speak to the bank and get back to you
Thanks for the support
Free admission for members: Europa-Park organises SC Freiburg fan day
The Europa-Park, named after the Europa-Park stadium of the SC Freiburg, has invited to the SC Freiburg fan day.
As the park reports, members and season ticket holders of the sports club from the Breisgau as well as members of the fan community were allowed to visit the Europa-Park free of charge on this day.
In addition, there were vouchers for drinks and sausages.
The roller coaster trains were lit up in red and white on this day.
Fuchsle, Ed Euromaus, and many red and white balloons provided the perfect backdrop," said the park.
The cooperation between the Bundesliga club and the leisure park in Rust, 40 kilometers north of Freiburg, has been in place since the beginning of the 1990s.
At the first SC Freiburg Fantag at Europa-Park, it was again shown how well the partnership fits.
Seeing happy fans having fun together on the roller coaster confirms this," says Europa-Park owner Jürgen Mack.
Why is that #NUMBER# and not like originally 1699€?
Stages in the career of the new world champion Verstappen
The Dutchman Max Verstappen is the new Formula 1 world champion.
Max Verstappen has done it.
The Dutchman takes his first World Championship title with Red Bull in his seventh year in Formula 1.
His path to the summit of the king class:
Abu Dhabi - 2012, Italy: Verstappen loses the kart world championship after a crash in Sarno.
Father Jos Verstappen lets him stand annoyed at a petrol station on the way back.
His mother, Sophie Kumpen, picks up the teenager in the following car.
2014, England: Red Bull's junior team gets promising new talent in Verstappen.
The 16-year-old is following in the footsteps of Sebastian Vettel and Daniel Ricciardo.
He continues to compete in European Formula 3 for the time being.
2015, Australia: Verstappen starts at the age of 17 years and 166 days as the youngest pilot in history in a Grand Prix.
Due to a defect, he had to terminate his Toro Rosso prematurely in Melbourne.
2015, Malaysia: The then Toro-Rosso pilot Verstappen is also the youngest race driver to earn points in Formula 1 at the age of 17 years and 180 days.
Verstappen takes seventh place at the Malaysian Grand Prix in Sepang.
2016, Spain: Verstappen wins his first race for Red Bull.
At the age of 18 years and 228 days, he is sensationally the youngest Grand Prix winner in Formula One history.
2019, Hungary: Verstappen celebrates his pole premiere in Budapest - he is not the youngest.
At 21, he beat Valtteri Bottas and his Mercedes teammate Lewis Hamilton.
2021, Abu Dhabi: The summit is reached.
Verstappen celebrates with 24 years at the Formula 1 finale in Abu Dhabi his first world title - with a overtaking maneuver against Hamilton in the last round. dpa
I had a huge argument with you then #NUMBER# when I ordered the #PRS_ORG# chest of drawers.
Judith Hermann read from her novel "Daheim"
As part of the "LiteraTour Nord" reading series, author Judith Hermann read from her current novel "Daheim" in the sold-out Blue Note on Friday and also served as moderator.
She is divorced, lives in a house on the coast and listens sensitively to the nocturnal sounds at her front door.
I submitted a contact form to return an item yesterday, but haven't received an email confirmation or anything like that.
My question would be if my request has been received.
Not everyone has the time for your stupid chat and cheap rubbish from China.
Your error to correct and not all of them from our household.
Contact Mrs. #NAME#.
I can't chat with them every day
We chatted yesterday and agreed that I or #NAME# would receive an email with a €60 voucher, another order for the #PRS_ORG# bedside table and a return shipping label.
This email has not yet been received.
The package is to be delivered to #PRS_ORG# today.
Please contact me
Sincerely,
The LokSound 5 Decoder can play up to 10 channels simultaneously.
Each channel can be resolved up to 16 bit / 31250 kHz and finally offers HiFi quality on your system.
It sounds almost exactly the same as the original.
A Class-D audio amplifier capable of up to 3W of output power is used to drive speakers with an impedance between 4 and 32 Ohms.
The huge 128 Mbit sound memory provides enough capacity.
All the individual sounds can be individually adjusted in volume.
The super-flexible sound engine without a rigid schedule allows the exemplary simulation of all conceivable rail vehicles.
Three individually adjustable brake functions and two alternative load scenarios give you maximum control over your vehicles.
I'm sorry, but just because he says he's not an antisemite doesn't mean anything.
That's like an AfD'er saying he has nothing against foreigners.
Neither of them will admit their i.
But Kollegah is constantly reproducing some kind of anti-Semitic messages.
If you want to distance yourself from something, then you should just let it go completely.
Yes, wow, then you are just as little to be taken seriously as Kollegah.
Anyone who seriously questions evolution is just completely lost.
According to me, a God has set the whole thing in motion.
But once you're a creationist, you have to believe that the Earth is 10,000 years old and that science is all bunkum.
And with that you are an enemy of science and not to be taken seriously like Kollegah.
To achieve an optimal field of view, the magnifying glass should be brought as close to the eye as possible.
The specially aplanatic-achromatic lens system allows you to use the magnifying glass practically free from distortion and colour errors up to the edge of the lens.
Often, loupes are marked with a magnification rating.
However, these values are only valid for exactly defined conditions, which are rarely in line with the conditions of use.
To be able to use your loupe optimally, we ask you to note the information in the "Technical Data" table (see operating instructions in the packaging).
Light reflections occur on the lens surfaces of all optical devices - including magnifying glasses.
With an anti-reflective coating, these reflections are significantly reduced.
If the optimal conditions of use are adhered to - magnifying glass close to the eye - reflections on the lens surface are less noticeable.
Further information can be found in the enclosed instructions for use (available in German and English).
Zeiss VisuCard Loupe ID Card Loupe Magnification Pocket Loupe Reading Loupe Reading Aid
Whether as a reading aid for on the go or just for the everyday little things: the Zeiss VisuCard is the ideal helper, as it can be taken anywhere thanks to its handy format.
And their hard shell makes them robust against special stresses in everyday life.
Each magnifier comes with a credit card sleeve for storage and safe transport.
They are bidding on these parts, which you can see in the pictures or under "What are you bidding on".
What condition is the item offered in?
Everyone can of course miss something once, because no one is free of mistakes - should this be the case, just send a message and it will be resolved to your full satisfaction (either by exchange, partial refund or complete refund).
They get a proper bill.
It will always be sent, unless the buyer specifically requests otherwise, insured with tracking number via DHL!
Please refer to the shipping conditions above for the individual shipping costs.
There are no additional handling costs.
Everyone says ok, authorized, how can I check more closely?
yes both the email address
#PRS_ORG# I will do very nice and good service, it took a long time to get to a person, but they were great
Hello dear #PRS_ORG# team,
I have already reported to you under customer contact with the number #PHONENUMBER#.
Yes, but it was called something else before.
They can't deliver from England because of #PRS_ORG#.
Christmas tree sale in Schönwolde: In the community of Krembz, women choose the Christmas trees
Farmer Frank Diers has already experienced many strange situations when selling Christmas trees.
In one case, a man was even driven home without his partner, because they could not agree.
Every year, he plants about 2,000 of them.
The 56-year-old has already experienced some bizarre situations.
This makes the pre-Christmas season a little bit more fun, he says.
And what about the voucher?
Otherwise, I'll take my business elsewhere?!
After all, I have received a faulty delivery and now paid the full price for it.
Then I will rate it accordingly!
We don't need to debate which court is better here, but there is a certain similarity between the two.
Both consist of meat that is grilled on a rotating skewer.
And both have therefore their name.
In German, an equivalent might be something like "Dreher," which doesn't sound nearly as tasty.
Problems with fibre optics + Devolo DLan/Magic
We've had a new fibre optic connection in the house for a few weeks now.
Unfortunately, I now have trouble setting up a stable WiFi network.
Previously, I had a DSL 50 Mbit connection, and I used Devolo DLan, which received and sent 50 Mbit without any problems, apart from a few outages.
The new fibre-optic connection sends 500 Mbit to the FritzBox 7590 and the DLan module, which is connected to the FritzBox, also receives them.
However, at the other DLan module, which sends the Wifi, no longer the full 500 come through, but the further I am away from the module in the house, the less comes through (so I use a socket, which is 1, 2, 3, etc. rooms away from the other module).
This leads to the fact that the Internet with the new fibre optic connection is even slower on the first floor than before (\~45 Mbit).
I have also ordered a new Devolo Magic Set, which apparently uses a new technology.
This was slightly better than the DLan, but there were similarly large losses.
Could someone explain to me why so much internet speed is "lost" via power lines with fibre optics?
And is LAN really the only solution?
It would be extremely difficult to lay LAN cables in the house now.
I'm really desperate, which is why I've created a special account here.
Therefore, I would be all the more pleased to receive an answer.
When it's time to switch current account
Who would have thought that now there would be peace at the Giro accounts, has been deceived.
While many banks have used the autumn to get their customers to confirm the fee increases of the past with all kinds of tricks, the threshold for negative interest rates is also falling further.
The Deutsche Bank, for example, was long considered relatively generous with a limit of 100,000 euros.
Now, she has halved the tax-free allowance and even quadrupled the daily allowance.
In a first step, the limit was only lowered for customers of the group's Postbank division - to 50,000 euros for current and investment accounts, and to 25,000 euros for savings accounts.
However, these lower allowances now apply to the entire Deutsche Bank, as a spokesman confirmed on request.
And not just for new contracts, but also for "new individual agreements made with existing customers".
The Commerzbank had already gone down to a limit of 50,000 euros, which is still valid, as is the case with ING Deutschland.
The direct bank DKB, which is popular with cost-conscious customers, has lowered the tax-free limits in two steps, first to 50,000 euros, and now to 25,000 euros.
After all, more than 100 banks now offer a tax-free limit of 25,000 euros or less, according to figures from the internet portal Verivox.
The Sparda-Bank Berlin has also arrived at 25,000 euros: However, there is still a legal dispute with the consumer centres, which in the first instance before the regional court of Berlin even won against this regulation.
Now, the banks are already discussing whether the institutes should set up provisions - in case the higher authorities also declare the negative interest in principle to be unlawful and many millions have to be paid back to bank customers.
The table top for 8 people was delivered instead of the one for 6 people.
The underbed is for 6 people.
Jennifer Aniston employs an entire beauty army
She is now officially at the top of Hollywood.
But their lives are like a roller coaster ride.
Jennifer Aniston (52) has been chosen by the US magazine "The Hollywood Reporter" as the most influential woman of the year.
For her, who made a splash in 2021 with the "Friends" reunion and the continuation of her series "The Morning Show," this success is first and foremost the result of a lot of discipline and work.
An entire army of assistants, stylists and trainers take care of her appearance.
After all, says Aniston, she treats herself to one chip a day (yes, you read that right: one SINGLE chip from the bag).
That their hearts are flying to both female and male fans is actually a miracle.
Maybe she's just unlucky in love - and still searching for the great love.
And she crossed having a baby off her list.
Previously, she was constantly asked when she was going to become a mother.
That hurt her.
The people that ask that have no idea what's going on with me personally, medically, why I can't do it.
It was really hurtful.
It remains to be hoped that success and fame will also bring happiness.
An unworthy end to a career: Räikkönen has to give up
Kimi Räikkönen's departure from Formula 1 was quieter than expected.
Abu Dhabi - The 42-year-old Finn took off his gloves and wiped the sweat from his forehead.
That was it.
After a driving error and a slight contact with a barrier, Räikkönen had to retire his Alfa Romeo at the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix after less than half of the race distance.
It was his 349th and last Grand Prix, the "Iceman" ends his career in the top class of motorsport.
To see him off, his wife Minttu and their two children had also travelled to the United Arab Emirates.
Räikkönen's greatest success was winning the 2007 World Championship in a Ferrari.
He achieved 21 Grand Prix victories, started from pole 18 times, and finished on the podium 103 times. dpa
Friedrich wins 60th World Cup victory - Nolte wins in two-man bob - Sport
The brand of the Norwegian biathlete Ole Einar Björndalen with 94 successes is the goal of the bobsledder.
"I have worked it out, I need to win nine and a half per season, then I can make it to Cortina 2026," said the double Olympic champion from BSC Oberbärenburg, who recorded two successes in two days at the races in Winterberg.
On Saturday, he fended off the attack from Johannes Lochner by five hundredths of a second, moving up from third to first place.
Then he changed something in the material setting and on Sunday he drove with a lead of 0.30 seconds.
With his team Thorsten Margis (SV Halle), Candy Bauer (BSC Oberbärenburg) and Alexander Schüller (SV Halle), he beat the Briton Brad Hall.
The Austrian, Benjamin Maier, came in third.
"We took a bigger risk today and it paid off," said Friedrich, who added a 22nd straight win.
Berchtesgaden's Johannes Lochner, who was driving for Stuttgart, came in fifth after finishing second previously.
Christoph Hafer from BC Bad Feilnbach finished eighth after finishing fourth in the first race.
"If I knew what he's doing differently, then I'd do it the same way," said Lochner.
Nolte wins at home - Podium for Jamanka
In the women's race, Laura Nolte won the third season victory on her home track.
After finishing fourth the day before in the monobob, she raced with pusher Deborah Levi to win the World Cup on Sunday.
Two-man bobsleigh Olympic champion Mariama Jamanka from BRC Thüringen came in second with Germany's fastest sprinter, Alexandra Burghardt from Burghausen.
In addition to qualifying for the Olympics, she scored her first podium finish this winter.
Wiesbaden's Kim Kalicki finished third with Leonie Fiebig.
For me, it was supercool, first podium place in the World Cup, I'm superhappy that Mariama is taking me with her.
I'm super happy with the development.
There is still a lot of potential at the start, but the start times today were okay," said Burghardt and emphasised: "It's not just pushing, but there's also a lot to do around it".
Jamanka was a little annoyed about the not quite flawless rides, but said: "It is going in the right direction."
I already had the duvet in my basket and could buy it now!!!
What am I supposed to do?
I did not receive it and therefore could not cash it in, which is why I have finally asked about it.
Because of Corona, I had completely different problems last year and never had time for it.
And now it was said that he was out of date, which made me very angry.
Look at the chat - it was about the Asare bench.
I would like to return it and then re-order as it's on sale right now :)
Why is shipping not started until 16.3?
There was nothing on your website about such a long delivery time
No, only when I tap on it does an extra field appear with the message
It was taken yesterday by your colleague.
Why is this a problem today?
I have also sent you pictures of the wrong item delivered.
But we do want the unit, just a new, undamaged one.
And not to cancel the entire order.
Only this day, only this week, only until XY...
Hello ladies and girls and women,
I have a lot of things I just want to write down and maybe it's the same for one or the other...
I'm 24, I have cPTSD, I'm a full-time student, and I'm a dog mom - apart from the fact that my dog doesn't cry or go to kindergarten, he's basically my child.
My boyfriend (of 6 years) is sick, got a 2nd degree burn on Monday and has been depressed for years (but is now in therapy).
I visited him yesterday, because I also have emotional needs, and because I want to see and feel him, we cuddled a lot, and it was nice.
I helped him in the shower (because his hand is bandaged due to a burn).
He's also under the weather and we're seeing each other less (1-2x week) which is very hard on my needs for affection and love.
My doggy child just has stomach ache, I cooked for him and now he is lying in his cuddle blanket and has relaxed a bit after I was there for him with the heat lamp and stroking.
I live with my sister and my mother, and she's away for a month.
Now, we also have housework to do, of course, which we naturally divide up between us.
But even cooking for myself is a lot of work for me...
My PTSD is currently well controlled, I'm half-way well treated and coping.
Not good but I'm coping and I'm almost symptom-free.
My university is demanding a lot from me at the moment (for me), I have a written test tomorrow at 3pm for which I haven't done anything yet, and the day after tomorrow I have an anatomy class for which I should at least prepare a bit.
And next week I have an oral exam on Tuesday, and what comes after that is in my calendar and not in my head because there's no more room there.
So my week goes like this: Only until tomorrow, then it's the weekend.
But then the whole thing continues, doesn't it?
Only until the birthday.
Only until the start of the holidays.
Only until the weekend.
Only until...
And so this goes on forever.
I think I'm just so stressed that I need those mental cues, otherwise I wouldn't be able to do it.
Somehow I feel guilty and "chaotic", but I can't do it any other way...
Do you feel the same way?
Honestly, I'm infinitely grateful that I don't have to work.
I can't really put into words how grateful I am.
I don't know if I would have survived my kptbs otherwise.
I believe that it also has something to do with women's mental load, and that's why I thought that I would probably find like-minded people here...
I wish you all a restful evening, the week is almost over!
Today I received my order, unfortunately the whole thing is a different colour plus the surface is scratched and the table leg has a mark.
The first delivery was exactly the same colour as on the website.
We are very disappointed!!!!
What can you offer me?
If we exchange the table now, will I get a different color or what?
The email to cancel was sent on 26.12.#NUMBER#.
In fact, twice.
It was not confirmed, however.
Something completely different: I noticed at school back then that many religion teachers do not believe in God and for them religion is just another subject like maths or geography.
For me, it was always a bit strange, perhaps also because I was brought up as a Christian and I always somehow believed in it.
How do you feel about it?
Perhaps you can also talk about co-workers or fellow students with different attitudes.
Basically, I understand the difference between private and professional, and it makes sense to keep them separate.
After all, there's a curriculum, and so on.
But it would also be strange to have a physics teacher who doesn't believe in relativity.
What makes someone want to teach religion if they don't believe in it?
Maintain culture or something like that?
I hope your question isn't too personal.
Can't it be changed or not? Please write in English, I understand it well.
That's a very long time, then I would refrain from it
That's good, thank you.
I expect a response in the near future, at the latest by the beginning of next week.
Thank you for your support #NAME#.
Film search help please
Hello dear people,
I'm looking for a film from my childhood (I'm 24).
I think it's a movie for teenagers.
The film has two time axes (or parallel worlds).
There is the modern world (the real world).
On the other hand, there is the past (or the realm of the dead) (not entirely sure).
Since I can't really describe it in the real world, there's a young woman.
And in the realm of the dead, a young soldier (in a uniform similar to that of the soldiers from Pirates of the Caribbean).
For some reason their paths cross and a story is created.
The antagonist is also a soldier from the realm of the dead who wants to bring the woman into this realm in order to be able to live himself, I mean.
I believe that the transition is also the grave of the soldier.
In the end, I think the two soldiers are fighting against each other.
If this means anything to you, I am grateful for any response.
Our little one has only slept on her tummy since week 1.
Fast forward: still alive :D
Relax.
So a child can take a lot more than you think.
Make sure everything else is right, no cuddly toys, go in there more often and take a look, but no minutes of surveillance.
That drives you crazy!
Fresh air in the room.
A good mattress.
No pillows.
Oh, and ours didn't have a sleeping bag, but always a blanket.
Look at your child when it is sleeping.
Does it turn its head to one side?
Can it lift itself up from the belly?
Or lie face down, directly in the mattress?
That's how you can tell if everything is all right.
We've also all grown up, and when my husband was born, for example, it was common practice to put the kids to sleep on their stomachs.
In addition, we are already "regular customers" with you and have already purchased many items.
But why are you only offering me 20 euros?
Hello, I have already written to one of your colleagues yesterday and have not yet received a response.
It's about my wardrobe that arrived yesterday (order number: #ALPHANUMERIC-ID#).
The right drawer doesn't fit in the cupboard.
I ask you to contact me as soon as possible.
The wardrobe is not currently usable.
To put it bluntly.
RBTV has promised a lot.
And yes, I know that not everything can be held.
And I also had a lot of fun with RBTV.
But it's just so that the politics of this broadcaster are now at rock bottom.
Nearly every format is sponsored (okay), but then to go on a massive begging tour at the same time.
It has been said that one is an "independent" Internet broadcaster.
Quote Arno: "We don't want to be a running litterbin."
What are you now?
A 0815 advertising channel, which is trying to sell its BilloMerch to the elite fan.
And then we have Marah's do's and don'ts.
They apply to everyone, except Simon and Etienne.
They can continue to insult people, of course.
A Krogmann who is completely lacking in empathy and who, at the expense of the action with the rented rooms that have exploded, is trying to make ash.
How can you find all of this good?
It's great if you like it, I find it terrible.
I am requesting a call back as my delivered wood table was delivered defective.
Corpus fracture due to damaged delivery by #PRS_ORG#.
Whether as a comfort for stomach ache or just for cuddling - my little warmth friend is multi-purpose.
Cherry pit cushions are a traditional home remedy for soothing heat applications, as cherry pits can hold and release heat well.
The removable inner cushion is easily heated in the microwave or oven.
The soft material makes the application particularly pleasant, so that the little ones feel safe, even when they are not feeling well.
The cherry pit pillow with cover is only suitable as a heat pad for the following areas of application:
Before heating, check for unusual smell, stock or burn marks and discard immediately if present.
Please remove the inner cushion from the cover before heating it!
Warm in the microwave at a maximum of 300 watts for a maximum of 2 minutes (follow the microwave manufacturer's instructions!)
Immediately after heating, distribute the heat evenly in the cushion by shaking it!
Finally, place the inner cushion back into the cover.
During the first heating there may be a slight amount of moisture on the surface, but this will disappear after repeated use.
Be sure to follow the recommended heating times, as longer times or higher energy levels can cause damage (danger of ignition and burning!).
Before heating a kiss in the microwave, check the manufacturer's instructions to see if heating grain products is allowed.
After putting the heated inner cushion back into the cover, please check the temperature of the cushion for suitability for babies (max. 43 °C) at your elbow crease!
Do not use the pillow for acute and chronic, inflammatory or febrile conditions, circulatory problems, fresh hematomas, bruising and open wounds, and for people with reduced pain sensitivity.
If you have existing skin, heart, vein, diabetes, or cancer conditions, or are pregnant, please consult a doctor before use.
If any seams have opened and loose kernels are coming out, discard the product and any loose kernels immediately and out of reach of children.
If the product is used on babies under 1 year of age, the temperature of the child should be checked regularly during application to prevent overheating!
All serious incidents associated with the product must be reported to the manufacturer and the competent authority of the country in which the user is based.
The cover is removable and can be washed in the machine at 30 °C.
Please note the care symbols on the product!
Darmstadt is second after the first leg - Pauli wins in Düsseldorf
Darmstadt 98 is allowed to dream of returning to the football Bundesliga.
Meanwhile, Hannover 96 is working its way out of the table cellar.
Even under the third coach, it is not going well for Ingolstadt.
Cheers in Darmstadt after the late victory in the top game, joy in Hanover over interim coach Christoph Dabrowski and frustration in Ingolstadt after the failed debut under the new coach Rüdiger Rehm.
Is the battery broken?
Last night my laptop (ThinkPad E480 20KQ and about 3 years old) was no longer being charged by my power supply.
I bought this about 5 months ago, so it should still work.
I thought that the power supply alone was enough to operate it.
No luck, the battery is dead and the laptop will not start despite the power supply being plugged in.
I then removed the battery, but nothing happened here either.
Perhaps you have ideas?
A new battery has been ordered, but why can't I use the laptop on AC power?
Is something else broken?
Thank you for your help!
I want the delivery of the #PRS_ORG# to my room.
How do I book it?
I'm interested in the #PRS_ORG# chair.
But I don't know how high the seat is...
Often on tour and still a lot of equipment with you?
No problem with the Everyday V2 Backpack from Peak Design!
A 20-litre capacity also swallows larger photo equipment with ease, which can be safely stored using the padded FlexFold dividers.
And what else you need for everyday items remains well organised and can be separated from the photo equipment thanks to the practical access points in the individually configurable interior.
With the "update" of the Everyday Line to version 2 (V2), the series is presented in a new look.
The sleek, minimalist design has it all - with the Everyday Backpack series, Peak Design has developed some highly innovative solutions that reliably protect the interior of the backpack while still allowing quick access to photographic equipment.
This can be done in two ways: first, conventionally through the cover flap, which can be closed using the MagLatch closure system, an ingenious solution for effective protection that has already proven itself in the Messenger Bags.
Here, a lock hook made of metal is located in the closure flap, with suitable anchor bars on the front of the backpack.
Unlike most backpacks, Peak Design has thought about different "fill levels": there are 4 anchor bars, stably riveted, into which the closure hook can be hooked.
If the rucksack is fully loaded, you simply take the top bar, if it is rather empty, a lower one.
The flap closure and the hook are also magnetic.
This way, the backpack can also be reliably closed without resting the hook.
The second possibility also fundamentally distinguishes the Everyday Backpack from other camera backpacks: In addition to the lid, there is also a zipper opening on both sides of the backpack.
This eliminates the biggest drawback of traditional top-loading backpacks - you no longer have to rummage through the contents!
At the same time, this clever detail greatly increases the rucksack's suitability for everyday use: If you don't just take your camera equipment with you, but also everyday items or travel luggage.
In the Everyday Backpack you can individually configure the interior (more on that below) and thus store both things separately - and access them separately through the two side openings.
You can also pull the rucksack from the right side in front of the body to access, for example, the camera equipment in the right main compartment, while the everyday items remain safely in the left half of the rucksack and don't get in the way.
Comfortable, easy-to-adjust carry straps help with this.
And since the outer shell of the backpack is also made entirely from 100% recycled, weatherproof nylon, the contents will stay dry even if it rains in Scotland in autumn.
Unfortunately, I have been waiting in vain for the email from their support.
#NAME# sent me an email yesterday to confirm the assignment of the
Contact has been made with the shipping company to collect the wrongly delivered table.
So far, I haven't received a message.
I ask for immediate settlement.
I'm now already writing to the third support staff member, none of whom have got me any further than a promise that I will receive an e-mail as a confirmation.
This is the return of the wrongly delivered Custom #NAME#
Is it foreseeable when the wardrobe could be delivered again?
Keeping him is not an option for me...
It works.
Thank you very much for your help
I wish you a nice evening
Hello, my order number is #NUMBER#. When will the article be delivered?
The order and payment was on 12.1.21.
I was delivered a completely different lamp to the one I ordered
Please call me
If you extend the coupon, I'll place a larger order, but at least I've kept the damaged item and not sent it back.
And that the past year turned out differently than expected was something I could not foresee, and so I was unable to redeem and clarify it in a timely manner.
But I suffered damage as a customer, and I don't accept that.
Rotinger brake discs are designed for the requirements of the dynamic driver, who values reliability and safety when braking, even under difficult conditions.
Rotinger brake discs are cast and then machined (drilled and cut).
All tinted windows are made in short series according to individual technical characteristics, which are specific to certain windows and patterns.
Based on the individual technical drawing, a special manufacturing program is created, which is tailored to the balancing of the disk according to the characteristics of the original installation.
The modified windows produced in this way ensure high comfort and brake effectiveness.
The additional holes increase the efficiency of the cooling of the disc, while the cuts improve the cleaning of the brake discs and brake pads.
The aesthetic properties of our custom-made windows emphasise the character of each car with an attractive and eye-catching look.
Coloma is the town where an unexpected event shaped the history of the West.
In the winter of 1848, a man at the southern fork of the American River discovered glowing nuggets in the water.
Although he tried to keep his discovery a secret, the news spread quickly and set off the so-called "California Gold Rush" of 1849.
Thousands came from near and far to make Coloma one of the fastest growing and most prosperous cities in the country.
Areas were staked out, tents were set up, and saloons and hotels sprang up almost overnight.
Everyone wanted their share of the country's wealth.
For many, it was "Coloma or Bust!"
In this game, you're a pioneer looking for riches in the west and wanting to make a name for yourself.
You'll search for gold, recruit workers, round up horses and build businesses.
You will also have the opportunity to explore the surrounding rivers and adjoining areas.
You are not alone - the other pioneers seem to have the same idea!
You have to beat your fellow pioneers or you'll go under like the rest of them.
Coloma is a fast-paced strategy game with many paths to victory.
You choose your actions simultaneously, have to manage your resources and build a tableau that works more and more for you ("engine building").
The buildings on your tableau allow you to become more efficient, gain additional actions, or use rules to your advantage.
With these buildings and the dynamic bridge tiles, you can develop your individual playing style with fine adjustments.
Coloma takes place over a three-year period from 1848 (the year gold was discovered in Coloma), 1849 (the year of the California Gold Rush), and 1850 (the year California achieved official statehood).
A year in Coloma consists of five rounds.
During each round, players secretly and simultaneously choose a location on the game board where they can perform actions.
Then their selection is revealed and they place their pioneers in the appropriate locations.
When a location has the most pioneers, it gets locked up!
This deactivates one half of the location - thereby reducing the possible actions there.
Then the players take turns performing actions, such as gathering resources, moving wagons, setting up tents, scouting rivers, building bridges, opening stores and placing gunfighters.
When all the actions are completed, the pioneers return.
The spinner turns to a new location at the start of each round, changing the available actions.
This continues until the pointer has moved five times, thus covering each location once, and the year ends.
There is a shootout in which players have to defend Coloma from a gang of angry bandits.
When the players have contributed enough gunfighters and outnumber the bandits, they receive rewards.
But if they fail, they get lower rewards or end up in the graveyard.
The game ends after the third shootout, then the final ranking is determined.
The player with the most victory points wins!
For free shipping, I accept up to the dimensions 35 x 25 x 4.5 cm the shipping method, goods delivery (games wrapped in foil).
For everything else, it's usually DPD, insured and with tracking (games are wrapped in film, covered with tiles and packing paper).
If you are a collector, I can also send the carton in a carton for an additional charge of 2 euros, so that there is 100% no pressure points.
"Why children are not tyrants" documentary, ARD Mediathek
CW psychological violence, sexual abuse, abuse of power
The ARD documentary appeared in my Twitter timeline today, and I watched it straight away.
>The child psychiatrist Michael Winterhoff is a regular guest on talk shows and gives lectures throughout Europe.
With his book "Why our children become tyrants" (2008), he sparked a heated debate about education.
Former patients and legal guardians are now making serious accusations against him.
Please take care of yourselves, the film is hard to watch.
And I am very grateful that many people now think and act differently.
It should never, never, never be about power over the child for parents and other responsible adults.
Our goal must always be to give the child space to develop, and to make the framework for the child as large as it is reasonable and possible in the situation.
Brrr, I still get chills.
Holetschek: Countries are consulting on dropping the test requirement for triple-vaccinated people
The health ministers of the states want to decide on a nationwide abolition of the test requirement for triple-vaccinated people at their next meeting.
"We countries need clarity quickly on whether and when the testing requirement can be dropped for those who have been vaccinated three times," said Klaus Holetschek (CSU), chairman of the Conference of Health Ministers, to "Bild am Sonntag".
The removal of 2G plus for those who are triple-vaccinated is "not only medically sensible, but also provides an additional incentive to get vaccinated," said Holetschek.
Federal Minister of Health Karl Lauterbach (SPD) has promised that he will make a proposal to the health ministers' conference as early as next Tuesday. − afp
So I want to send the lamp back
What is the best way to go about this?
Hi, I think the #PRS_ORG# chair is very nice, but I can't see how high the seat is.
Can you help me?
I can't buy anything from my #PRS_ORG#.
Notice: Oops, an error has occurred.
Shopping through the #PRS_ORG# website on the computer works.
I've updated my account details.
What could be the reason for this?
What you describe is referred to as "awareness", i.e. sensory perception under general anesthesia.
These occur with a frequency of about 1 in 1000.
The most common experience is hearing sounds/voices, less common is seeing images, and the rarest is experiencing pain.
Relevant to this topic: C-sections are operations that come with an increased rate of awareness, as a very deep anesthesia is avoided to protect the baby until it is weaned.
Prior episodes of awareness should be discussed during the pre-operative consultation.
Certain anaesthetic techniques such as total intravenous anaesthesia (TIVA) carry a slightly increased risk.
**EDIT: Hey all, this comment of mine describes Awareness correctly, but** u/Nitemarex **by definition had none.
I misread her comment.
But the chair is defective.
Unfortunately, the 20€ doesn't help us either.
These are statutory warranty claims.
The absolute minimum would be that they take back the defective chair.
This is in addition to the legal requirement, and is standard practice in the eCommerce sector.
Please check whether they at least take back the broken chair.
We will then sell the second chair privately.
We also lose a lot of money.
I already sent you an email that you did not respond to.
Once again the question.
The order and the invoice state that the goods will be delivered to a room of my choice.
The shipping company is #NAME#.
I just called there.
I was told they only deliver to the front door - due to #PRS_ORG#.
Is that so?
If so, I'll have to cancel the order because I don't know anyone who can carry the heavy furniture up to the first floor.
If I'm not called, then what's the point?
I asked a question
Theater historian Günther Rühle died at the age of 97
He has made a name for himself as a theatre critic and as an artistic director.
Later, he wrote a monumental history of the theater.
On Friday, Günther Rühle died at the age of 97.
There is the new book on the table, hot off the press: "An old man is getting older".
The shocking diary of a slow departure from the world, which the theatre historian and journalist Günther Rühle has kept until April 2021.
And in the middle of reading comes the news that the author has died.
The last sentence in the book reads: "I am already testifying my life's gratitude here."
There are different types of pallets.
One of the most common is the europallet, a standardised wooden pallet that is mainly used as a load carrier in the European area.
They are certified by the European Pallet Association (EPAL)
In 2020, according to data from Statistics Austria, more than ten million pieces of pallets were produced in Austria.
The production value was around 79 million euros.
The number of pallets imported into Austria each year is not recorded
New York wins the MLS Championship for the first time
New York City FC won the Major League Soccer title for the first time.
After the 1:1 in regular time against hosts Portland Timbers, the team from the Eastern Conference decided the final in the penalty shootout with 4:2.
In the Eastern Conference finals, New York had defeated Philadelphia Union, the team of German Kai Wagner.
Rouladen tips & tricks
I received many great tips here a week ago for the perfect goulash.
I had it at Christmas and it was unbelievably delicious and melt-in-your-mouth!
So thank you again for that :)
Now I've got a taste for it and want to cook rouladen for the first time on New Year's Eve.
Tomorrow, I will make a beef stock for it.
Do you have any other tips for me?
Note: I don't have an oven, just a big pot.
How does it go on from here?
What about the books or how do I get them back on my #PRS_ORG#?
My English isn't as good as it used to be, but I get by
This is about a refund of €#NUMBER#
I was informed by email on 18.01. that the refund had been made.
But to this day, I have not received the money.
Please check that.
Where there are still Christmas roasts in the Lübeck area
For many people, goose or duck is as much a part of Christmas as the Christmas tree and the presents.
You haven't got your poultry yet?
Now, time is running out.
We will tell you where you can still get a Christmas roast in the Lübeck area.
The "drive" of a tube power amp contributes significantly to the warmth and fatness of the guitar amplifier sound.
These characteristics are perfectly implemented by the Valve Reactor circuit.
With the VOLUME, GAIN and MASTER VOLUME controls, you can set the desired level and amount of distortion for your sounds.
In addition, the VT+ series amplifiers feature a unique POWER LEVEL control that allows you to reduce the sound level without changing the "gain" or the distortion.
Further up, it was already mentioned that you can even make a power reserve available quickly with the POWER LEVEL control, if things get unashamedly loud.
Thanks to the POWER LEVEL controller, the full potential of the VT+ series can be used in every situation.
The headphone jack can also be used as a line output.
The signal attached here is in fact processed with a speaker simulation, so that you yourself get an eminent "acoustic" sound impression, even when using headphones or when recording directly.
A CD or MP3 player can be connected to the AUX socket, so you can jam to your favorite songs.
A tuner function is also on board - so you don't need a separate tuner.
If you also buy a VFS5 footswitch, you can call up the sounds conveniently with your feet, switch the effect blocks on and off and "tap" the tempo of the compatible effects.
For live use, this is actually indispensable.
With its new power packages, VOX is taking another step into the future!
But I've seen others do it.
Is it possible to return the lamp?
Because it hangs too low over a dining table?
So I'd like to send them back.
Can you help me with that?
And the chest of drawers?
Will we get an update on the exact delivery date in the coming weeks?
Hello, have you ever sat on the #PRS_ORG# chairs
If it doesn't work, I'd also be happy with a refund or a voucher.
In some cases, I can find a buyer for the furniture.
More than 1,000 Euros for goods I don't need is a bit much.
I have just received my delivery and would like to know if screws were included as part of the delivery.
I would like to install the #PRS_ORG# mirror (door) on the intended hook.
This is not a satisfactory response and the wait has not been worth it
Do you have a premium customer status?
Iran sees progress in nuclear talks
According to Iran, progress is being made in negotiations to revive the international nuclear agreement.
"Both sides are on the verge of reaching an agreement on the topics that are to be on the agenda," Iran's chief negotiator, Ali Bagheri, told the Iranian news agency Irna on Sunday.
This is a "positive and important development," because initially, there was not even agreement on the topics to be negotiated.
The agreement should prevent Iran from building nuclear weapons.
On Thursday, the Vienna talks on reviving the agreement continued after a nearly one-week break.
Iranian, German, British, Chinese, French and Russian negotiators are taking part in the talks.
A US delegation is also in Vienna, but is only indirectly involved in the negotiations.
Thuringia overtakes Saxony - Free state is now the federal state with the highest COVID-19 incidence
Thuringia has taken over from Saxony and currently has the highest incidence rate in the country.
As the only federal state, the value is above the mark of 1000.
As the only federal state, Thuringia was above the mark of 1,000 for the Corona incidence on Sunday.
The Robert Koch Institute gave the seven-day value with 1,025 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants.
In Saxony, which has always shown the highest incidence nationwide, this value was 990.5 on Sunday.
On Friday and Saturday, the incidence in Thuringia was slightly reduced, but was also above the value of 1000.
In Thuringia, 2,242 new infections with the Sars-CoV-2 virus and 16 further deaths in connection with an infection were reported within one day.
200 people severely ill with Covid-19 were receiving intensive care treatment in hospitals on Sunday.
On weekends, there may be delays in registration.
In addition, the health authorities have been overburdened for weeks and can hardly keep up with the registration of new cases.
I understand that.
As delivery is not until the beginning of March, it may be possible by then.
I need to print it out and stick it on the package and drop it off at the post office, right?
here I don't have to click/enter/fill in anything else?
This is exactly what I want to avoid, which is why I am writing to you.
I would like to take responsibility for the return at my own expense, please.
8 euro return charge in my eyes is a cheek.
It's time for change
###Hello Bundestag, I am u/StratorDE in the plenary hall at the heart of Europe on a fantastic day!
Why is the post here?
If you look at the activity in the past months of the Bundestag, you can see one thing: it does not exist.
We've come to a winter lull and extended the summer lull for a few months.
#Where is the problem?
Yes, what was the reason?
Most of it is probably just related to the dissatisfaction with the way some things have gone here and how we stand in general.
In recent days, it has become increasingly clear that many people here are still really enthusiastic about the Bundestag.
#What we need to change
At this point, the community around the German Bundestag is being asked, which wants to keep it alive.
The impetus came from u/edizVEVO, who became aware of this project in recent days and found, simply put, a mess.
After some back and forth, several people from the community have come together who are interested in rebuilding the project.
However, I would also like to urge everyone once again to get involved, only in this way can this project continue to exist in the future.
We have created a discussion platform in the form of a Discord server where we can exchange ideas with each other and work on concrete things.
You can join the server via this link.
Goals:
* How should the Bundestag function in the future?
* Which existing orders need to be changed/amended/removed?
* How should we present ourselves to the outside world in the future?
* How will new members be recruited?
* How do we create a fair voting system?
I'm pretty sure that I forgot some things, but that's not a problem, for that we have Discord in the end.
If you have time and interest, come to the Discord, work with us and let's decide democratically about the future.
I've ordered a lampshade from you, which is yet to be delivered.
Now I see that the article is too big/clumsy for it and not suitable for my taste.
I have already ordered a different suspension from you for this.
I put it together and then noticed it when I took the soft foam.
I'm very sad about that.
I hope that this is returned and I get a full refund.
This is also pretty sad as the #NAME# is much darker than expected.
I have another question: the day blanket #PRS_ORG#, is it also available in larger sizes, such as 240/240 for example?
#PRS_ORG# must be able to guarantee me that the faulty cupboard will be collected in a timely manner.
And I ask you to make that happen now.
I don't have suitable packaging, but I will dismantle the wardrobe as much as possible for collection - they will need to discuss with #PRS_ORG# how this can work.
#PRS_ORG# can call me at any time to arrange a collection date.
Is there an installation guide?
How long would I have to get them or decide to return them?
How do you answer the question of why you're vegan?
Today I had a conversation with a colleague that I like.
She herself once lived as a vegetarian for a while, but now probably eats meat very rarely.
I myself was a vegetarian for several years.
When asked if I had always wanted to be vegan, and if vegetarianism had been a planned interim step, I answered honestly without much hesitation.
That I thought for a long time that I would be supporting animal welfare as a vegetarian, but eventually reflected and understood that I was ultimately also supporting animal cruelty.
Hence, my decision to become vegan.
At that moment, I had the impression that discontent was arising on her side, she then defended vegetarianism and said she knows where her meat comes from and that as a vegetarian you reduce animal suffering.
Now I wonder if my answer was too "plump"?
How does she answer the question?
I feel like as a vegan you are quickly put in a corner and conflicts arise without you wanting them to.
A harmony-loving vegan greets you (;
This is clearly not an exception under § 312d of the German Civil Code.
Their #PRS_ORG# does not exempt you from the legal requirements for distance selling.
I am not at the designated date and time that #PRS_ORG# is picking up my return.
Since I can't be there because of a funeral, it can't be changed, unfortunately.
I would like to be assigned an alternative pick-up time, please.
As of 01.02.#NUMBER#, I will again be available on an ongoing basis.
Lahnstein Wehr equipped for water rescue: 45,000 euro grant from the state
Recently, the Rhineland-Palatinate Minister of the Interior, Roger Lewentz, presented a grant decision in the amount of 45,000 euros for the new water rescue vehicle of the Lahnstein volunteer fire brigade to the mayor, Peter Labonte, in the Lahnstein town hall.
The total cost of the vehicle, which has been in use since November 2020, was 135,000 euros.
A good and important investment in safety.
I'm happy that the state of Rhineland-Palatinate is supporting us in this", says Peter Labonte, the mayor of Lahnstein.
The vehicle is used by the Lahnstein diving squad, one of a total of seven units in Rhineland-Palatinate.
Above and below the water they perform tasks in water and ice rescue as well as technical assistance.
In Lahnstein, they are counting on a permanent increase in call-outs: The boom of hotel shipping on the Rhine and Moselle as well as the further increasing use of the Lahn as a leisure river contribute to this.
I bought a book that I could only read 10% of and then the problems began.
I can't open the book.
I have followed your recommendations but synchronised, removed and reloaded the app but NOTHING has worked.
I'm a bit frustrated because the whole thing has already cost me a lot of time and now I'm hoping for help.
Okay, that's how it is then.
I would like to order 3 items from the #PRS_ORG# collection for June.
Can I enter a time in the ordering process?
The previously mentioned values are determined according to the ANSI/PLATO FL1 standard in the Fenix laboratory at 21°C±3°C, 50%-80% humidity and with the built-in 275mAh LiPo battery.
Values may vary depending on flashlight used, age, and environment.
*: The burn time in the Bright stage includes the burn time with reduced brightness due to overheating protection.
2) Dealers are responsible for customers.
Customers should contact the dealers or distributors from whom they purchased the Fenix lights for warranty support with the 'Warranty Card' of Fenixlight Limited and either a commercial invoice or a receipt.
Fenix will provide our authorized dealers with the technology and parts necessary to service our lights.
1) 15-day free replacement: Fenix will replace a new product within 15 days of purchase due to manufacturing defects if problems occur during normal use.
We will replace it with the same model.
When a model is discontinued, customers get a product with a similar or improved model.
2) Free repairs for 5 years: Fenix offers free repairs for 5 years from the date of purchase if a problem occurs during normal use.
Different guarantee periods for different products:
With the exception of the products and accessories listed above, other products or free offers from Fenix are not covered by the product guarantee.
3) Limited Lifetime Warranty: For fixtures that have exceeded the free warranty period for repairs, we offer lifetime repairs but charge a fee for parts.
The retailer tells the customer the cost of the part before the repair is done.
4) Warranty Certificate: Customers request customer service from Fenix dealers or retailers by presenting a completed Fenix warranty card, a purchase receipt, or a receipt.
The distributor should offer services to customers, and Fenix will support these services.
5) The free warranty does not cover damage or downtime caused by:
any defects or damage caused by misuse, including, but not limited to, use not in accordance with the warranty or instructions in the product specification.
For example, the product specification describes that the sealed head must not be disassembled as this may damage the flashlight and void the warranty.
Any faults or damages caused by other behaviours cannot be properly controlled by Fenix.
6) To make a warranty claim, please contact our warranty department with the following information: name, type/model of warranty item, serial number.
Thank you first of all for standing up to all of this, I have also spent almost a decade in government service in a similar capacity, i.e. we were also armed officers in the executive, I don't want to go into it any further!
I always find the question of right and left to be very simplified.
Generally speaking, however, one should say that, of course, a public servant is more likely to come from the liberal to conservative spectrum and not from the revolutionary left; this should be clear to everyone.
Of course, it should also be clear to everyone that people wearing a uniform and carrying weapons should also attract people to the right of conservative magic, that these people can of course have a hard time with the lived reality is also clear, because in addition to the average white person, there are now many Germans with a migration background, women and also homosexuals (and by that I do not mean the over-feminine stereotype queer, because these are in the executive branch rather less or not at all, but quite normal men and women who you don't notice if they don't tell you) and also on these people can and must I rely, because in doubt they save your life or set it up for you.
But even these fringe groups represent, in my experience, a conservative attitude, meaning that they are proud of Germany and feel less and less included by over-the-top left-wing politics, even though this politics supposedly stands up for them or wants to make things right for them. They simply want to be treated like normal people.
Going back to the right-wing, as the police and military are of course a cross-section of society, one will also find extreme right-wingers there, but that they are allowed to openly state their opinions there or even openly hatch any state-endangering plans is completely exaggerated in the media and also annoys me.
Of course, it happens that police officers and soldiers, who are often deployed abroad, start to generalise and say things that are controversial or even politically incorrect, based on negative experiences.
It also happens that right-wing sympathizers meet and engage in a lively exchange of ideas.
However, I believe that this kind of thing is well combated and also countered with political education and enlightenment!
Germany is so international and I think it's a good thing that we can't afford to have real racists and Nazis in our ranks!
Yes, what I don't understand is that I also ordered the other basket on the German side.
Why should it come from England?
When I ordered, it wasn't sold out.
I ordered in November already.
but it was confirmed to me in your order confirmation
It is still about my order, which is no longer deliverable.
I was chatting with #NAME# before.
Alternatively, one could have the other #PRS_ORG# basket for #NUMBER# euros in black delivered to Germany or is this basket also available somewhere in Germany.
I can only find you as a partner company.
but on the top edge of the wooden part there are two deep grooves that have been filled with something yellow
and there is a small scratch on the mirror itself
Regular as clockwork?
Hello, I (w32) have been bothered by something for a while.
I'm very disciplined and organised at work (self-employed, very little leisure time), but for as long as I can remember, I've struggled to keep my household permanently clean and tidy.
There are always phases in which everything remains as it is, and then and there, it gets to me and I tidy up and clean.
But it's not really "in case someone just happens to drop by."
My husband is (unfortunately) no better, it bothers me somewhere but most of the time the household simply loses against work and disinclination.
The kitchen is cleaned most regularly as we like to cook.
Now to my question, have you managed to get decent with a child?
We don't have one yet, but we're working on it, and this question has been on my mind for a long time.
Because for me I have no motivation, it just doesn't bother me so much as long as no visitors come and, for example, there is always fresh clothing there and the kitchen is usable.
Does having a child give you greater motivation, or do you slack off?
Looking forward to your answers.
An exclusive, new, high-quality and anatomically pre-shaped cut offers maximum comfort, a perfect fit and almost unrestricted freedom of movement.
Pre-shaping with special, further shaping at the joints for improved freedom of movement (for arm and knee bends)
For the Focea Comfort 4, the area covered by the Flex System 2 was more than doubled to further increase comfort.
Seamless stretch panels at the joints reduce friction (armpits, arm and knee bends)
High quality pre-shaping in the lower back area and in the crotch ensure a close-fitting, perfect fit.
Elaskin 8.8 stretch panels in the lumbar area increase flexibility around the back zipper, improving comfort, especially when bending and when mounting and donning gear on the surface.
The Free Flex Zone that surrounds the shoulders and back ensures increased flexibility in movements of the arms and back.
Fireskin is a warming, water-repellent material with a special surface structure that provides a high degree of cold protection.
When positioned on the chest, it brings warmth to a sensitive area of the body.
Seamless, thin (-2 mm) seal at the face on the hood increases comfort, seal, and durability (separate head hood)
Soft, in-collar zone improves sealing with a fine-tuning width adjustment by means of a flexible, gentle hook-and-loop closure that does not stick to the coating or to the seams
Zippered double-cuffs at the wrists and ankles combine a fold-back inner cuff with a soft, lined neoprene outer cuff
45° notch at the end of the inner sleeve for increased elasticity and durability when pulling on.
Long zipper at the back of the neck with an elastic reinforcement, for an anatomical cut with increased comfort on the overall without a hood
Long G-Lock P back zip (overall without hood) with metal slider and integrated Water Dam System for improved waterproofing (Beuchat patent)
Zippers on the arms and legs
Neoprene reinforcements at all ends of the zips to prevent ripping if too much force is applied.
Neoprene panels butt-welded with external and internal overlap
The edges of the outer cuffs are edged for greater durability
Ribs on the inside of the cuffs have been cut for increased flexibility
The original Beuchat system was designed to secure the computer in place, especially for deeper dives (the system is compatible with all common wrist computers)
Career in social work - as someone with an insecure personality disorder?
I did a training in software development and have now been qualified for about a year.
Unfortunately, I realize more and more that this profession is not the right one for me, which is why I've been thinking for a long time about starting over and studying social work.
The problem: I have an insecure (or anxious avoidant) personality disorder (APD).
Roughly speaking, this means that I have no self-esteem and am therefore shy.
I have no problem talking to people on a factual level, but I find it very hard to have casual conversations and I've been told more than once that I come off as unapproachable (although I think I've gotten better at that).
Can I become a social worker that way?
I don't want to work as a streetworker or in an open youth centre, but rather in, for example, addiction counselling or family assistance.
But I don't know if the actual day-to-day work is really like what I imagine it to be, and it's difficult to find anything on the internet about it.
The AVPS is already causing problems (for me, emotionally) in my job, because it drags me down every time there's something wrong with my code ("messing up the simplest things again"), and it's hard for me to ask more experienced colleagues for help ("I should really know how to do this by now"/"I'm holding him up with my stupid questions"/"he must think I'm really incompetent" etc.).
I'm probably going to have problems in every job, but I wanted to mention it here.
But did you get your sofa back?
Because for that, there was no confirmation either.
I'm waiting for an appointment to pick it up
What do they mean by please give back!
When I have downloaded a book on the #PRS_ORG# I get the message Your #PRS_ORG# does not authorise this book
Is there a problem with that?
I was chatting with #PRS_ORG#, who asked me if I had received delivery confirmation for my cupboard.
The protein taken in with the feed is broken down in the bird's digestive tract into the individual protein building blocks (amino acids), which are then used to build the bird's own protein, which is also needed for feather formation.
The feather formation in nestlings and the feather renewal in moulting birds are extremely complex processes and are associated with a particularly high stress for the entire organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio must not be administered during breeding, as this may lead to disruptions in the hatching process.
Following this course of NEKTON-Bio, it should again be switched back to the daily supply of vitamins with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral preparation).
The protein taken in with the feed is broken down in the bird's gastrointestinal tract into the individual protein building blocks (amino acids) and from these it builds up its own body proteins, which it also needs for feather formation.
The feather formation in nestlings and the feather renewal in moulting birds are extremely complex processes and are associated with a particularly high stress for the overall organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio must not be administered during breeding, as this could cause disruptions in the hatching process.
After this course of NEKTON-Bio, daily vitamin supplementation with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral supplement) should be resumed.
1 g NEKTON-Bio in 250 ml of water or 100 g of soft food.
Only prepare as much drinking water/soft food as the bird will consume in a day and change water/food daily.
One stroke of the measuring spoon (enclosed) corresponds to 1 g of NEKTON-Bio.
In the case of severe feather damage, a double or triple dose of NEKTON-Bio may be given at the start, until the start of feather regrowth is visible.
After that, the normal dose is given until feather regrowth is complete.
Storage: NEKTON-Bio should be stored dry and out of direct sunlight between 15° and 25°C.
Please excuse us, but the chair is sold as an office chair.
How can an office chair break after 9 months?
The warranty claims in Germany are 24 months.
That's really bad service.
Hello, I sent an email on Monday to advise that my order arrived damaged and pictures were attached.
Did you receive this email?
Statement by a community worker contradicting the regulation
Hello r/LegaladviceGerman,
I have the following problem.
A walnut tree is to be cut down on our property.
So, a felling application was submitted to the municipality.
A staff member writes to me to say that the felling of fruit trees, and thus also the walnut, is not part of the charter.
However, in the by-laws, the walnut is explicitly listed as a tree to be protected.
Can I rely on the employee's statement, or not?
On the one hand, I have to be able to rely on expert opinion.
On the other hand, the statute is clear.
Thank you for your responses
We understand this.
Then we'll use the new packaging for it.
I have not received a message
Well, then I still have a sofa without use.
Can you offer me a discount or a voucher?
What was more expensive?
Yes, I believe so, but the question is whether I can pay in euros and have the blanket delivered to Germany.
Can you check that?
Breaking news: Heavy traffic accident in Selb
Recently a serious traffic accident occurred on the St 2179 between the Selb-Nord interchange and Plößberg.
According to the current press release from the police (14:03 p.m.), a car came into oncoming traffic while overtaking.
There are injuries.
Ah, okay, I understand.
Well, thank you very much for making it so easy!
Advice and ideas for further professional life
First of all, Merry Christmas to you all!
My Christmas is unfortunately not very good, because my dear head is currently crushing everything that can be thought of.
Before I go on now ... in short: I need advice and the best advice is from people who know my situation somehow - so from you.
I'm currently doing the refereeing course as a newcomer.
Originally, I studied something else and also worked in a different field (to remain at least a little anonymous, I won't say anything more specific here).
But then it was all too boring for me, and I looked for alternatives that could be more fun for me.
At some point I ended up in the teaching profession and was sure that this is it - even though the framework conditions are significantly less flexible than in my previous job, but that didn't matter to me.
I'm now on my third "I'm going to Google other job postings."
And it has only been half a year.
With the paintings before, I always decided to keep going and finish at least the ref, after that I can always pivot.
But I'm absolutely exhausted right now.
I've had so little time off in the last month that I'm completely run down.
Now it's holiday time, but there's still a lot of work waiting for me.
Before the referee, I always thought I was stress-resistant, but there, my weekend was also my weekend and my evening was my evening.
That's when I was free.
And the stress at work didn't matter in those moments.
Now even family celebrations are too much stress for me.
And then there are these rigid structures, which get on my nerves even more.
Basically, it's fun and from the outside, the refereeing is going well, in terms of the feedback and so on.
But I am completely exhausted and wondering how much stress my body can take before it completely shuts down - if it hasn't already.
I wonder if I want to have this for the rest of my working life - especially when I read some of your contributions here - or whether I should go back to the old area, where I was valued, could take time off when I needed it and although the work was somehow boring, I was paid fairly for it and worked as part of a team and not as a lone fighter like it is most of the time now.
But then I wonder if I won't be back in the same place as I am now in a year's time and be dissatisfied.
You can tell, it's all kind of crazy, but maybe you, as an outsider, have some advice or ideas on how I can get out of this situation, where I'm completely done and start to cry at the drop of a hat.
I'm not going to make any decisions now when I'm this emotional. It probably won't lead to anything good.
But maybe your views will help me to see a little light at the end of the tunnel - or to enjoy Christmas, which is enough for me for now.
Thanks for reading and sorry for the whiny undertone of this.
I hope my situation is at least a little more clear.
Since its introduction in 2001, the VOX Valvetronix series has continued to evolve, including the combination of advanced modeling technology with the "Valve Reactor" circuit that perfectly simulates the behavior of a tube amplifier.
With the VT20X/VT40X/VT100X amps, we introduce a brand-new modeling engine that is absolutely state-of-the-art in terms of sound.
Thanks to the VET (Virtual Element Technology) which is based on the analysis of the components and the amp circuits, the VTX amps come with an authenticity that is absolutely impressive.
Of course, these amps also include the multi-stage Valvetronix tube preamp.
This is partly based on real analogue circuits, because these get the sound variations and nuances of a tube amplifier better than any simulation.
In addition to this sophisticated circuit, the VTX amplifiers offer a closed housing and a bass-reflex system, from which the natural resonances just bubble.
With VOX's "Tone Room" software you can even tweak historical facts on the virtual plane until the amp and effects sound exactly as you've always imagined them.
The perfect combination of tube sound with modeling technology is in the first place due to the VOX Valve Reactor technology, which was presented in 2001.
Of course, it has since been improved several times to meet new sound requirements, which in 2010 again resulted in a performance boost for the VOX Valvetronix series - with more dynamics and numerous and significantly improved amplifier models.
From the handy VT20+ up to the VT120+ with two speakers, the new VT+ Valvetronix series has been designed so that all guitarists who are looking for maximum sound diversity will find what they are looking for.
All guitarists dream of the crunch and dynamics of a tube amplifier: they expect a fat sound, a nuanced reproduction of playing dynamics and string attack, and a quick response.
During an in-depth analysis, the VOX engineers discovered that the output stage in particular determines the tube character of an amplifier and developed the VOX Valve Reactor technology based on this finding.
Each VT+ amplifier's Valve Reactor circuit, equipped with a 12AX7 tube, perfectly emulates the behavior, subtle nuances, and tonal characteristics of a tube amplifier.
NBA: Despite 20 points from Wagner, the Magic lost to the Clippers
The Orlando Magic's losing streak in the NBA continues.
The Wagner brothers can shine, but it's not enough to win against the Los Angeles Clippers.
Despite 20 points from Franz Wagner and seven points from his older brother Moritz, the Magic lost 104:106 to the Los Angeles Clippers on Saturday.
The large main compartment is also adaptable: with three individually placeable and fold-away hook-and-loop fasteners, it adapts entirely to the needs of your photo equipment and is thus suitable for all types of cameras - from mirrorless system cameras of all sizes to full-frame DSLR cameras.
What ultimately fits in the backpack depends, of course, on the size of the camera and the lenses.
A possible configuration would be a DSLR camera with a mounted lens, two to three interchangeable lenses, and a mounted flash.
Larger DSLM cameras like the different models of the Sony a7 series or a Fuji X-T2 still leave room for more lenses.
You can also store a lot of accessories in it.
And if you have a small DSLM camera (MFT cameras from Olympus, Fujifilm X-A or E series), you can use the backpack for your equipment and for things unrelated to photography.
Drone pilots also make an optimal choice with the Everyday Backpack 20L, as the backpack offers enough space for a DJI Mavic Pro, including remote control and accessories.
Volcanic eruption on La Palma: probably the longest in history
In the almost three months since the start of the outbreak, the lava flows on the Canary Island have caused great damage.
Is an end in sight?
With a duration of now 85 days, the volcanic eruption on La Palma has been the longest in the known history of the Spanish Canary Islands since Sunday.
Until now, the eruption of the Tehuya volcano in 1585 with 84 days was considered to be the longest on the Atlantic island off the west coast of Africa.
There are no reliable data on previous eruptions.
The activity of the yet-to-be-named volcano in Cumbre Vieja has decreased slightly in recent days, but volcanologists still dare not predict when it could end.
The indicators point to a slowdown.
The best news is that they are stable," said the president of the island council, Mariano Hernandez Zapata, to the state TV broadcaster RTVE.
Damage in the millions
In the little more than three months since the outbreak began, the more than 1000 degree hot lava has destroyed almost 2900 homes and other buildings, as reported by RTVE.
Just under 1,200 hectares were covered by a metre-thick layer of lava.
That is almost equivalent to 1700 football fields.
More than 7,000 residents had to be evacuated, and the damage is estimated at more than 900 million euros.
Two new land peninsulas were created off the coast by cooled lava, with a total size of about 50 hectares.
In particular, the banana cultivation, which is extremely important for the island, was hit hard, from which about half of the approximately 85,000 inhabitants live directly or indirectly, and which was already in crisis before the volcanic eruption.
225 hectares of banana plantations were destroyed and further areas severely affected, the newspaper "El País" wrote.
Christmas and the gifts
Christmas is just around the corner and, in particular, the children will hardly be able to wait for the heavenly feast.
The many colorful presents under the Christmas tree, combined with the spiritual atmosphere and crackling tension, have something alluring about them.
Christmas is one of the few traditional occasions that still hold our increasingly divided society together.
It is all the more important to be aware of the Christmas tradition of giving, so that the gesture of giving, which, according to the French sociologist and ethnologist Marcel Mauss, was a peace-promoting "social contract of nature peoples", can escape the rigid routine and be brought back to life in the context of this tradition.
How Saint Nicholas became the Christ Child
Strictly speaking, it was the Protestants who linked the Christmas days with gift-giving.
Previously, on St. Nicholas Day, gifts were exchanged in one way or another.
The background to this still popular custom is that Saint Nicholas, as bishop of Myra, secretly threw gold into the window of three women one night to save them from a life of sin.
From this unconventional way of giving came the popular German practice of filling children's boots with presents.
Protestants were put off by this practice, because they reject the idea of intermediaries between God and man as "veneration of saints".
For this reason, they are opposed to the institution.
Martin Luther made St. Nicholas into the Christ Child, thus founding a new tradition.
With this, the focus of gift-giving shifted to Christmas Eve.
Since most Protestants do not see such details so narrowly, only a few people are annoyed that the tradition of St. Nicholas, similar to the tradition of St. Martin with St. Martin's songs and St. Martin's procession, is still a fixed part of the pre-Christmas season.
Today, one can find everything from socks to sought-after luxury watches in front of the door and under the Christmas tree.
Diversity of traditions in Christian countries
Sources indicate a tradition of gift giving on Saint Nicholas Day since the 13th century.
With the Reformation, the day of giving shifted to Christmas Eve.
In all the Christian countries, however, there is a cheerful muddle over the question of who brings the children the presents.
In Germany, it depends on the region whether the Christkind appears on Christmas Eve or Santa Claus, who in principle is a kind of Saint Nicholas, to whom over time some characteristics have been assigned.
These include his white beard, which has little in common with the more severe Assyrian beard of the historical figure, his sleigh pulled by reindeer and his preference for the chimney to gain access to the houses.
In the Netherlands, Saint Nicholas remains the central figure at Christmas.
In Spain, the Holy Three Kings give the gifts, while in Italy the witch Befana is said to have guided them to the baby Jesus.
In Scandinavia, it is often mythical creatures that bring the presents, while in Russia it was Father Frost that brought some fame.
Here, it is not reindeer, but three horses that pull his sleigh as a troika.
In the Czech Republic, the birthplace of the Reformation during the Hussite Wars, the Christ Child is responsible for the distribution of gifts.
I have been getting this error message for 3 weeks when trying to download a new book, but my account details and contact details are up to date:
Please help to fix the error, because I
Otherwise, buy a different e-book #PRS_ORG#.
I requested a return label for my order #NUMBER# last week and this morning.
I was told one would be sent to me.
Since I haven't received one yet (not in the SPAM folder either), I wanted to ask now, how long this usually takes.
Thank you very much.
Police shoot suspected bank robber near King's Palace
On Saturday, a man armed with a knife was shot dead by police near Kensington Palace in London.
Police said callers reported a man walking into a bank and a bookmaker's shop with a gun.
The man fled in a vehicle, according to authorities, who were able to stop it a short time later.
Shots were fired, and the man was hit.
He was pronounced dead at the scene.
Police did not suspect a terrorist background.
The area around Kensington Palace is home to several embassies.
The palace is the official London residence of Prince William, his wife Kate and their three children.
Other members of the royal family also live there.
which ones?
No matter where I click, I will be immediately redirected to your page.
The decorative light fits harmoniously into every bed, garden area or rock garden.
The light is simply set up and can be secured in the ground with 2 ground spikes.
Integrated 0.4 Watt solar module for optimal charging of the built-in battery.
Burning time max. 10 hours.
"The robust plastic housing is suitable for year-round outdoor use.
In the Hollywood spectacle, it is usually threatening objects from distant galaxies that glow brightly inside.
On the other hand, »Smart Stone« is completely harmless: The sun alone is enough to ensure that this solar lamp shines fascinatingly – optionally in white or coloured light (in six different colour tones).
The edge-free, amorphous design is deliberately chosen: like a naturally formed large pebble, this modern light object presents itself during the day.
Its organic curves fit into any natural setting - whether on the edge of the terrace, in the lawn or in the rock bed.
It also does well in the company of larger pebbles and boulders, where it can hold its own thanks to its size.
You can save yourself a lot of preparatory work: as a solar light, "Smart Stone" does not need either a power supply or batteries.
Put the "beacon" in any sunny place during the day.
Two included ground spikes ensure a firm hold if needed.
The matt-white plastic shell itself is robust and weather-resistant.
Its solar panel discreetly conceals "Smart Stone" inside, together with its battery and two LEDs - one for white and the other for coloured light.
The battery is already charging as soon as sunlight falls on the case.
At dusk, "Smart Stone" automatically starts to light up; the colour is up to you: there are six attractive light colours to choose from, in addition to daylight white.
Switching off also takes place automatically as soon as the battery level has fallen to a predefined minimum or it gets light again.
Once the sun shines again, the charging cycle starts all over again the next day.
I've done that several times and it doesn't work.
It's a shame, I would have liked to continue to order from you, but if the voucher is not credited to me, then I will not order again out of principle.
If you change your mind, let me know.
Otherwise, that was then the last contact today.
Then send me the number for the sideboard.
During the lockdown, no hardware store is open anyway...
The motor control of the LokSound 5 has again been fundamentally improved.
A variable PWM pulse frequency from 10kHz to 50kHz ensures super-quiet operation, especially with bell-armature motors - the typical "humming" is a thing of the past.
The load distribution can now be adjusted for difficult cases with up to 10 CVs.
The unique 'Autotune' function allows the decoder to be automatically matched to the motor.
The LokSound 5 decoder delivers up to 1.5A of motor current, enough juice even for older motors.
- please use the Ebay shopping cart to have the shipping costs summed up correctly.
- You will receive an email with the tracking number of your package.
- When you buy new goods from a specialist retailer, you will receive an invoice stating the VAT.
- We normally process your order or enquiry within 24 hours on working days.
The pill problem
Hello ladies,
I hope I'm doing this right, it's actually my first post after a year on reddit.
My problem: About five years ago, I had to start taking the pill again, mainly because I had such terrible pain during my period and terrible PMS before my period.
Now I would like to keep it that way, because I already have to take enough medication for my chronic conditions, which I cannot choose myself.
My main problem, surprisingly not the pain, but my skin.
I'd gone from 0 to 100 in about two years when I last had a break and I had spots all over the place.
So far, so superficial, but it really weighed on me and I didn't feel good about it.
In the two-year break, things have never really normalised.
Maybe someone has some tips to avoid this happening again.
My cosmetics is already perfume-free and without nonsense, but maybe there's something that someone can recommend to me.
Unfortunately the gynaecologist did not take me seriously, and I still have an appointment with the dermatologist.
Many thanks to everyone who has read the novel!
Yes, skin is such a thing.
I had really bad neurodermatitis, then a time of rest, then large-scale nodule lichen, and then the acne issue.
I have also tried everything in terms of nutrition in the context of a chronic illness, and have remained on a diet that is low in sugar, milk and meat, because nothing else really works well.
It could also well be that hormonally, the worm is just in there, but if you have construction sites everywhere like me, you don't really want to go looking for what else is going wrong.
I already had everything from her colleague semina o. a.
I wrote and now I've lost the conversation and I don't know what the response to my request was.
I have to work in between and answer the phone, and suddenly everything was gone...
what is there to check, if the money was there, I would have seen it
Please check my bank details, maybe there was something wrong.
but does it exist in general in large
since it is widely available in black in large sizes
Zappiti 4K HDR Series - The best movie experience ever!
Zappiti designs and manufactures high-end video management systems; for the best image quality, excellent performance and ease of use.
All Zappiti products are designed to give you a comfortable and intuitive access to your entire movie library in stunning 4K high-definition resolution.
The award-winning Zappiti Players are successfully used worldwide to enhance the movie experience, both at home and in commercial environments.
The Zappiti Neo supports most digital audio and video formats including the latest 4K HDR standards such as Dolby Vision and HDR10+, almost all current video file formats, full BD/UHD menus, HEVC video codec with a billion colors (10-bit color encoding), VP-9, 3D video standards with 3D subtitles, high-resolution audio files such as DSD, FLAC, ALAC and MQA, and comes with a wide, solid case, two HDMI outputs, 4K 60p, Dolby Atmos and DTS:X for the best possible home cinema experience.
The combination of the Zappiti Magic Pixel V3 and VS10 Video Processing offers outstanding image quality - far better than previous generations - with improved dynamics, precise color rendition, increased contrast, solid de-interlacing and better upscaling (up to 4K resolution).
Even on a Full HD 1080p TV or a front projector, you'll be blown away by the picture quality of your display!
3D also offers a better sense of depth and an impressive, immersive effect.
Some Android apps are not suitable for use with the remote.
In this case, use a connected computer mouse or an AirMouse (not included).
Network Playback: Special network optimization that, thanks to the SMB protocol (including HEVC UHD files), guarantees better performance when playing back over the local network via Gigabit Ethernet or 10/100 Ethernet, regardless of the type of media.
Universal RC: Seamless integration into Smart Home installations via ready-to-use Control4 drivers, RTI drivers, Elan drivers, Crestron IP codes, Savant, ProControl, Logitech, URC, Pronto and general IP codes.
It doesn't help much as I've been waiting for it since September.
Now nothing works at all.
My account is apparently locked and the language is English
Also compatible with all printers that use the above products according to the manufacturer or instruction manual.
More than 10 years of experience as a specialist retailer in toner production
All listed company and brand names as well as all mentioned type designations are the property of the respective legal manufacturers and rights holders.
Its mention is only for orientation purposes as well as the identification of the compatibility of the goods.
These are not original products from the respective printer manufacturers, but compatible goods.
Which vouchers???
I didn't get credit for my last order!
In the name of the people: Lay judges pass judgement
In the courtroom, they sit on the judge's bench in their everyday clothes.
But their verdict matters a lot, even if they don't wear a robe: Jurors determine, together with professional judges, whether and for how long someone goes to jail.
Two of them report in conversation with the "Public" from their time at the Bad Kreuznach district court: Sascha Wickert from Boos and Ruth Ertz from Bad Kreuznach are two of a total of 125 lay judges at the district court on John F. Kennedy Street.
Hello, unfortunately I can't get into my customer account.
Could you please send me the invoice for order #NUMBER# again to the email address above?
Can we dispose of the packaging material?
We have no means of keeping them for so long.
We would use the table as they offered it, as if it were ours.
gladly, had already ordered the same chair in blue in nov. and also received it. I would therefore, because they are so beautiful, now have one in grey
Does the wardrobe have to be completely dismantled for collection and return?
and when would the pick-up be?
The 110 kV underground cable will be rebuilt in 2022
The permit for the relocation of the new high-voltage cable in Tann is legally binding.
The plan approval decision of the Government of Lower Bavaria paves the way for construction, which is scheduled to begin in 2022.
The network operator Bayernwerk announced this now.
The approximately seven-kilometre-long underground cable will connect the Tann switching station in the north of the municipality with the existing 110-kilovolt line between Simbach and Pfarrkirchen.
The cable will be connected to a pylon of the overhead line near the village of Edermanning at Reut.
Good morning,
My order from 03.01.21 with the order number #NUMBER# has only arrived with us in part so far.
The blue Betsell number: #PRS_ORG# with the delivery number #NUMBER# was returned by #PRS_ORG# with the note "Delivery not possible".
The other three packages have arrived, so delivery is definitely possible.
Can you tell me what the next steps are?
Have a good start to the week!
You can forget it, I explained it to you several times yesterday!!
It's a glass dresser and all the sides have burst open, so there's glass everywhere and the box is broken
The chest of drawers is in my apartment and #PRS_ORG# refuses to come into the apartment because of the #PRS_ORG# regulations
That means the chest of drawers can't be collected because nobody is allowed into my flat
Thank you for the message
But why only 20 euros?
The original value of this chair was #NUMBER# EUR
No, it is with all books, that's why the request to #PRS_ORG#, as it is probably a general problem
Ref: Lesson planning (EK)
Hello dear colleagues,
I've been in the Ref since the summer. I enjoy teaching, but I'm currently having a lot of trouble planning my geography lessons in a time-efficient way.
Unfortunately, my school is not technically well-equipped at all, so I can basically only use the blackboard, the textbook and an overhead projector as media.
At school, I can only copy s/w for free (which is annoying for geography).
I currently need a very long time to plan my hours.
For example, we are currently dealing with the topic of geofactors, and for me, each hour stands on its own.
In principle, the methods are always repeated, but on the other hand, I don't want to invest too much time in simple lessons (which I also need for UBs, etc.).
I always plan from the learning goal (what do I want to achieve) and then think about how I can build it up (I usually create a worksheet with texts from books that my school doesn't have).
We have the book Terra and I'm rather dissatisfied with most of the problems in the book.
This is why the worksheets are also included.
Maybe a geography teacher can tell me how to work efficiently with the book.
It would really make me happy.
I would like to return the #PRS_ORG# from order #NUMBER#.
I have actually already chosen a new one at #PRS_ORG# but I would really like to settle the return as soon as possible.
The trade is worried about the Christmas business due to the 2G regulation.
Only people who have been vaccinated or have recovered from the virus are allowed into most shops.
The trade considers this to be unnecessary and is complaining about a loss of sales.
He also has a possible solution at the ready.
From the perspective of the German Retail Federation (HDE), the 2G regulations are ruining the important Christmas business for the retail sector.
Turnover losses are to be complained of in dealings with items of non-daily needs, criticised HDE Managing Director Stefan Genth.
According to a recent HDE survey of 1,100 retailers, more than 70 percent of businesses have a negative outlook for the rest of the year.
Many have already written off the Christmas business.
"What should have been the positive highlight of the year is now often a bottomless pit," said Genth.
Dealers with 2G access restrictions lost around a third of their pre-crisis sales in the past week.
Things are only going well in the food retail and online sectors.
The association demanded consequences from the dramatic development.
Shopping with a mask, distance and hygiene concept is a safe matter, said the chief executive.
"2G when shopping does not help us in the fight against the pandemic," he emphasized.
The current regulations deterred customers and required a lot of staff.
He called for nationwide approval of the wristband regulation.
After that, each customer would only need to be checked once for 2G (vaccinated or recovered) and would have access to all shops with the wristband they received on that day.
In addition, in retail - as already in public transport with the 3G rule (vaccinated, recovered or tested) - sample checks should be sufficient.
The real estate company Deutsche Euroshop, which specialises in shopping centres, also spoke of a difficult Christmas season.
The frequencies were last at around 75 per cent of the pre-Corona level without 2G, and the turnover at around 90 per cent.
These figures will now certainly fall in the middle of the all-important Christmas business," said CEO Wilhelm Wellner to "Wirtschaftswoche".
Due to the high personnel and administrative effort, attempts will be made to find solutions and obtain approval for the centres.
This includes the so-called wristband solution, where "the visitors can, for example, once provide their 2G proof at a central point in the center and then - equipped with a wristband like in a club hotel - can enter all shops undisturbed". dpa
I recently ordered and received the #PRS_ORG#.
The Spiegel has a scratch and the frame also has a defect, which was tried to be covered with a yellow filler.
It looks ugly.
I would like to return the mirror and have already packed it back into the box and sealed it.
How do I proceed for the return now?
The lamp is designed for dual-balance, based on new, flat, high-power, high-CRI SMD LEDs.
A modern microprocessor controls the colour temperature and brightness of the lamp with exceptional capabilities.
In addition to adjusting the brightness, there are two standard colour temperatures: daylight and artificial light.
It is also possible to set and save the color temperature manually in the range of 3100 - 5650K.
Use the current settings in flash memory.
A special feature of the controller is that it is easy to use and intuitive.
The lamp produces a very high light output with soft, high-quality light that is completely flicker-free.
The 120° beam angle, which allows you to illuminate large areas at a relatively short distance, is excellent.
Incidentally, also in reporter situations in small rooms or at short intervals.
They can adjust brightness practically without changing the color temperature.
It's a great tool to work with whether you're on a film set or in a studio.
The optional DMX512 controller allows remote control of the light in TV studios or when the light is installed in hard-to-reach places.
On the back of the light is the control panel, which consists of buttons and a bright display.
The display shows the current brightness setting in percent and the current color temperature in Kelvin.
There is also a slot for NP-F batteries (not included)
User memory The memory holds up to three panel settings for brightness and color temperature.
To program the individual settings into the memory slots, simply press and hold one of the memory buttons and you're done.
The memory controller stores the current state of the lamp when it is turned off, so that when it is turned on again, the familiar situation is restored - very practical for studio work, for example, when the camera is set to specific colour temperatures.
One of the DL3120's biggest strengths is its ability to work with inexpensive NP-F batteries.
These are often already owned by photographers and cameramen (and women) - so you can make use of existing equipment.
The DL3120 can also check if the batteries have enough power before setting it up - it has a built-in battery tester - for each of the two battery compartments a value in the two display screens (the left battery on the upper display, the right on the lower display).
In addition, it is of course possible to supply the spotlight with power continuously using the included power supply.
The design of the headlight is very simple.
They have a 16mm sleeve for mounting, so you can attach them directly to your photography tripod.
The angle is set reliably with stops on both sides.
Care was taken to ensure that the mechanical components are also of an extremely high quality and thus designed for longevity and hard use.
In addition, a tilt joint is included in the scope of delivery.
It's great that it also comes with a bag.
This way, you can transport or store the lamp, along with all the accessories you might want to buy, without any problems.
It's a shame, I was given it as a gift and it's too small :(
"The party we wanted to throw": Frankfurt celebrates after a rich comeback against Leverkusen
What a spectacular response from Eintracht Frankfurt.
After 22 minutes, the Hessen, who had lost their last two games in a row, were supposedly on the way to their next Bundesliga defeat.
But then the SGE turned up, shot the frustration of a mediocre season start out of their system within an hour and won 5:2. "It's crazy what the boys have done today," jubilated coach Oliver Glasner on DAZN and spoke a "blanket praise, to each and every one of them who was involved."
At first, it looked like another setback for the now ninth-placed Frankfurt, which is still behind its expectations.
Patrik Schick had put the Leverkusener in the lead with 2-0.
What then happened also impressed the SGE trainer.
"How the players came back and showed a fantastic performance," said Glasner.
I'm really happy with the performance we showed and of course with the result.
Even defender Christopher Lenz, who was able to stand on the pitch for the first time since the fourth game day and his overcome muscle injury, stressed the morale of his teammates.
"I think our mentality is incredible," said the 27-year-old and with a look at the result he was particularly pleased for the spectators.
That was the party we wanted to throw today.
But for the upcoming tasks, Glasner now wants to keep the focus on himself, but he also sees himself well equipped in terms of the personnel situation.
It is exceptional that we have all the players fit in December, that all the players are in top physical condition.
It is top-class work in our medical department, but the players also live very professionally.
Now, they want to "go step by step and remain modest" and carry out the tasks until the end of the year "at this level".
Next up is an away game at Borussia Mönchengladbach (6.30 pm, Sky) on Wednesday as part of English Week.
I have just received an email that my package is being sent back to you because of an error on my part.
I've tried calling #PRS_ORG# and they won't transfer me, no chance.
Can it be shipped directly to me again, or do I have to wait until the money is refunded and place the order again?
For me, unfortunately, this would mean that I would not order again, because it has already taken a very long time.
Have you ever sat in a #PRS_ORG# chair?
Dampener for handball women ahead of quarter-final against Spain
Germany's women's handball team slunk off the court after the humiliation against Denmark with their heads hung low and their eyes empty.
In the end of the World Cup main round, the DHB selection suffered a heavy defeat with a score of 16:32 (8:13) in front of 800 spectators in Granollers. In the quarter finals, they will now have to play against the host country, Spain.
"We were much too afraid and had too much respect for the opponent," said national coach Henk Groener.
Against Spain we have to play differently.
After the first defeat in the tournament, Germany closed the preliminary round group III with 8:2 points as second behind the Danes (10:0).
It's a shame we couldn't take the flow with us.
It was a bad game from all of us that we have to get rid of," said captain Emily Bölk.
To make it into the semi-final, a significant improvement is needed on Tuesday against the 2019 World Championship runner-up to keep the delicate dream of the first medal since 2007 alive.
The best German thrower in the duel with the three-time Olympic champion Denmark was backcourt player Alina Grijseels with six goals.
"We just weren't there - neither in attack, nor in defence", admitted backcourt player Xenia Smits and demanded: "Now we have to look ahead quickly".
Not up to it from start to finish
Unlike in the previous five tournament games, the German team was not up to the mark at the start.
Missed shots and technical errors in the attack and gaps in the defence were responsible for a quick 0:4 deficit after seven minutes.
Only the goalkeeper, Dinah Eckerle, was immediately up to speed and prevented worse with some saves.
The first goal was scored by the DHB team after 9:30 minutes, when Grijseels successfully completed a fast counter-attack.
The hoped-for initial ignition was not this, however.
Against the aggressive defence of the Danes, the German women could hardly make an impression - and if they did, they mostly failed against the strong Althea Reinhardt in the goal of the Scandinavians.
So the game was over by 3:10 after 20 minutes, especially since backcourt player Mia Zschocke saw red a little later because of a hard foul on her opponent.
But in the quarter-finals, she is allowed to take part again.
It was only in the final phase of the first half that the DHB selection played a little better and at least came within five goals of the break.
The already faint hope of a comeback after the change was gone after seven minutes at 9:19.
The Groener-Schützlinge sinned again in all areas and made it easy for the well-prepared opponent, who is one of the medal candidates in the final round.
As a result, the German team could no longer muster up a performance boost and left the floor as a clear loser.
DACH Advent Calendar Day 6: Family Christmas traditions
As part of Reddit's advent calendar, we've snagged St. Nicholas Day and are using it as an opportunity to talk about family traditions during the pre-Christmas period, Advent, St. Nicholas' Day, Christmas Eve and the Christmas holidays.
What was it like at your home back then?
How about your\*r partner\*s?
Do you want to pass on your traditions to your children?
What is the best thing for the children?
Polishing the boots?
Baking cookies?
Decorating a tree?
Is there music?
Is it Santa Claus, the Christ Child, or is the gift from grandma and grandpa?
No matter how you do it, everyone makes an effort to make it as nice as possible as a family around Christmas time.
Whether it's fixed traditions, or even something different every year: tell us how it was or is in your family!
Please send me any transaction numbers or anything else that might help
Transfer confirmation... etc
I would like to gift a gift code
such as with #PRS_ORG# gift vouchers
How does it work for them?
The title already exists; I work as a vaccine doctor in mobile vaccination teams, in which (so far only) the BioNTech/Pfizer vaccine is administered, mainly in nursing homes.
Since these are nearing completion, I will go to a vaccination centre from now on.
I am happy to answer questions without a time limit on organisational and human aspects and also medical questions, as long as they are not personal (e.g. "I am taking medication X, is it compatible with the vaccination...").
In my area of responsibility is the information for the vaccination, the indication (the person is entitled to a vaccination according to the Corona vaccination ordinance and has no reasons that speak against it), the medical documentation and, if necessary, the emergency care in case of allergic reactions (never happened to me).
The vaccination itself can be delegated to qualified personnel, such as medical assistants.
In vaccination teams, however, we often do not have them, but only (for the love of God, no lack of appreciation!) pharmaceutical-technical assistants for the preparation of the vaccine, who, however, cannot carry out vaccinations (may not?), so that I carry out most of the vaccinations myself there.
Serious "Huidlerer" question: Amberger knows the solution
What in the world is a "Huidlerer"?
With this dialect word, sent in by an Amberg resident, a lot of thought has been caused in the BR television programme "We in Bavaria".
However, unlike many of the preceding days, the term in the "Host mi?" series was not guessed by the callers.
No, it wasn't a "guy who's nervous."
And no one who "has to do everything quickly".
This, the people heard from the TV presenter, was completely wrong.
For which the man from Amberg revealed the solution, and thus probably also caused astonishment among many Upper Palatinates.
"Der Huidlerer," the viewers learned, "is a rag with which someone wipes the oven."
The dialect researcher Antony Rowley, who has been interviewed as an expert by Bayerisches Fernsehen for years, confirmed this.
With the note that this is a typically Upper Palatinate term, derived somehow from the rather well-known dialect word "Houdern".
Which closed an education gap - perhaps also for many who have been living in the Amberg area for a long time.
I haven't been able to buy books for two weeks.
After confirmation, the following error message always appears: oops - something went wrong - try again later.
I have restarted the #PRS_ORG# , connected it to the PC, synchronized and repaired it.
Nothing helped.
Tire choice for racing bikes - really so puncture-proof?
This morning, I woke up full of enthusiasm, because I wanted to do at least a little training to prepare for my bike ride next week.
Said and done and I set off on my racing bike, which I bought yesterday on eBay.
The first 40km were also really nice - but then something happened that lurks in every city centre (this time: thank you Krefeld!).
Glass splinters on the track.
Zack, loud hiss, and my rear tire no longer wanted to take part in the rest of the trip.
Since I didn't have a real chance to get a replacement coat and replacement hose due to the day of the week, I had to turn around again with a semi-bad mood and take the first train home.
Then it wasn't so bad in terms of mood, maybe it's even better if I practice the tyre change again before the bike tour.
Now, however, I am faced with a question and hope that you can help me.
Since I have a relatively long distance over several days ahead of me, I would not like to get this problem more than once.
Now it wasn't really bad, as the old tyres from the previous owner (a very nice old man, who rode 120 km until 14:00 on the day that I came to pick up the bike!) and who also described them as suboptimal, because he has been riding on them for several years.
But if I think about the fact that I need to change a tyre after driving for 80-90km, then I'm in a really bad mood, I think :D
Now I struck up a conversation with an older man at the platform, who asked me in astonishment why I didn't have Marathon Plus tires; they are supposed to be puncture-proof, after all.
Now, of course, the whole thing sounds very tempting.
But are they really indestructible?
I'm not in the mood to spend 40€/tyre only to be disappointed in the end.
I also ask myself: I have 25x622 on my racing bike at the moment.
These do exist (apparently?) in the Marathon Plus tyres, but the majority are already wider.
Is this a problem?
Or would you generally advise me to use different tyres on a racing bike?
The Schwalbe side seems to recommend my absolute! Laiewissen rather recommend the Durano DD?
Thank you in advance for your help and kind regards!
Car crashes into tree: driver fatally injured
The 53-year-old had collided with a central reservation on the B57 between Rheinberg and Xanten for an unknown reason and then ended up in the opposite lane of traffic, as the police reported.
There was a head-on collision with the vehicle of a 27-year-old man.
The car of the 53-year-old was then hurled against a tree and the man was trapped in the car.
The 27-year-old and his 23-year-old passenger were seriously injured in the accident and were taken to nearby hospitals.
Yes, we have deleted all the books, authorized everything new and loaded new books.
Environmentally friendly: MOTIP DUPLI products are free of health-damaging metals.
The company is committed to using formulations without regulated or questionable ingredients, without affecting the best possible performance.
The caps and packaging are made from recyclable materials.
Disposal: Please only put rest-emptied containers in the recycling bin.
Take containers with leftovers to the problem waste disposal facility.
Labelling: All MOTIP DUPLI products comply with the current labelling requirements.
The classification, classification, and marking are carried out according to GHS or CLP 1272/2008/EC in the current valid form.
The Safety Data Sheets are in compliance with REACH 1907/2006/EC, Article 31 and Annex II, in their current valid form.
With many DUPLI-COLOR spray paints, spray protection and a break-proof closure cap prevent unauthorised use.
See the appropriate notice on the cap or label.
Before use, always read and follow the instructions carefully!
Do I get a confirmation by e-mail?
I've already been assured of that three times by your colleagues...how reliable is your information?
When will the shipping company contact me?
I already wrote, didn't you get my sms?
Following the release of our new B 100-6 OHM high-end wideband speaker, it was only a matter of time until our SOLO series would also get a new addition.
The new offspring is called SOLO 15 and looks like the big role models with the B 200 - 6 OHM.
However, this construction proposal includes a suitably designed foot to raise the speaker to the correct listening position.
This has no influence on the acoustics and can therefore be adapted in length according to the circumstances at home.
The SOLO 15 is very well suited for people for whom the maximum volume plays a rather subordinate role, but who want to achieve an exceptionally high level of sound quality.
A 10cm speaker is simply not capable of generating such high sound pressure levels without severe distortion.
However, this does not mean that the SOLO 15 sounds weak.
On the contrary, it walks impressively mature and for its size is extremely impressive and accurate.
The SOLO 15 was set with a slight high-tone increase.
This is common for widebanders to optimize the increasingly strong bundling at high frequencies.
The SOLO 15 is exactly aimed at the listening position, and impresses with a very clear and fine sound.
Turned slightly outwards, the high-frequency range can be reduced and the sound image can be made warmer.
Thanks to the point sound source, the location of the individual components of a music piece in the optimal stereo triangle is razor-sharp and surprisingly precise.
The reference-worthy, extremely low mechanical losses of the B 100 - 6 OHM result in a dynamic range that is hard to beat.
The SOLO 15 is therefore not only an addition to our SOLO series, but also expands it in terms of resolution and accuracy.
As with all our kits, it is a good idea to think about the final look of the speaker at the start to allow for any changes during the build.
If, for example, one wants to veneer the casing, the lowering of the speaker must be adapted accordingly, since the veneer adds material again.
After all the plates have been cut to size (e.g. at the hardware store), one should first drill an 8 mm hole in the floor plate at the appropriate place so that the cable can later be passed through there without any problems.
The loudspeaker opening in the front is now cut with the help of a router, so that the B 100 - 6 OHM can later be installed flush.
On the back side, this opening should be provided with a 45° chamfer in order to make the opening area of the speaker chassis as large as possible on the inside.
The four terminals of the B 100 - 6 OHM are interrupted in phase, as shown in the image "Detail Phase".
After this, you start building the actual box and place one of the two side walls on a flat surface in front of you.
The rear wall, the lid, the front and the base are now glued onto this.
The three stiffeners should also be installed and glued.
The stiffeners themselves can be varied in material thickness as required, for example, if you want to use ready-made mouldings from the hardware store instead of making your own from 16 mm MDF.
In the next step, the second side is attached.
Afterwards, all the plates of the foot are followed, i.e. the two sides as well as the front.
A suitable hole saw or Forstner bit makes it easier to attach the holes for the bass reflex tube, as well as the connection terminal on the rear wall.
Afterwards, one uses a round cutter to round off all the edges of the actual box.
The top of the footplate can also be rounded off with it.
After that, the base plate is firmly glued to the foot of the housing and additionally screwed on with long wood screws.
The next step is to mark and pre-drill (2.5 mm drill) the fastening points for the loudspeaker chassis and the connection clamp.
After the case has been cleaned of wood dust (vacuuming/blowing out), one starts with the laying of the cables.
The easiest way to do this is through the 35 mm bass reflex opening in the back.
In the process, one slides the entire and unabridged cable piece by piece through the 8 mm bore in the foot up to the terminal opening and lets it protrude there by about 30 cm.
At the top of the case, you run the cable to the speaker opening and let it dangle there as well.
The frequency changer is then prepared and inserted.
The construction plan of the frequency switch, as well as the corresponding connection plan can be found in the following document: Assembly instructions for the Solo 15 switch.
When the frequency changer is installed and the connection terminal is screwed, the sealing of the 8 mm cable opening inside the box follows, which is not yet completely closed.
With the 35 mm bASSREFLEX opening and a little skill, you can drop hot glue onto the opening to seal it.
With the opening of the B 100 - 6 OHM and with a small lamp you can check the sealing accordingly.
Now follows the eradication, according to the description.
Afterwards, the B 100 - 6 OHM is connected and fastened with the corresponding screws.
Polarity plays an important role here, so that the positive lead (marked cable) must be soldered to the positive pole of the speaker (the larger contact).
Finally, the bass reflex tube is cut to the specified length of 28 mm (total length of the tube) and inserted.
To combat this, a mat of the damping material is cut in two and distributed loosely in the case.
The opening around the bass reflex channel should be kept clear.
Can I place an order now and have it delivered in early June?
> Hi all,
> Finally, we can announce that we will host the OSCAST again this year!
"Unfortunately, for known reasons, we're not able to get more than four people in the studio, which has meant more planning and explains the short notice of the announcement.
BUT: There will be at least three people manning the switcher so we'll be watching the Oscars 2021 with at least 7 beans in the stream and hopefully thousands of you!
> We do our best to avoid delays or other problems.
But hey, it's still a pandemic, and we'll do our best to make the Oscars as entertaining as possible.
> It will start at around 0:30.
Chill out some drinks, plan some good food, and get ready for a long, but very interesting night.
